and cut.
First up is bridge work, specifically the Quivira Road span over I-435. Starting Saturday, March 3, the northbound lanes of the bridge over 435 will be demolished. Two lanes of traffic will continue in both directions.
An easy Cell phone tracking solution
Poor Robert.
Moong Dal Halwa is one of famous Rajasthan desserts. It is a winter special and this halwa is known to keep the body warm during the winter months. It is also one of the sweet dishes accompanied in the wedding feasts also. It is a simple dish made with Split moong dal, sugar, ghee and milk. I read that peoples of Rajasthan love to eat sweet before, along with and after dinner and lunch.
Having been working very closely with and for Joe (albeit now a long time ago) I know of no one better suited to talk about this topic: Joe is simply the best boss, manager, leader, coach and mentor I’ve ever met during my 25+ years in the business, not just in the software business, but overall!
I look at her and I know what’s going through her head. I watch her conduct the dog in choir practice and I’m suddenly six years old again trying to teach the family cat to sing. I study her looking at stick insect poo under a microscope, and I understand her fascination as I nudge her over and say “Giss a look then!”
“Eat and enjoy” were the two key points we need to bear in mind, the program told.
Minds That Made the Future:
The following articles touch on aspects of this attunement:
They live day-to-day with their crises and neuroses:
Anyway, we next headed across the field toward the pond. Of course, all that open area is really a wetland. Actually, a lot of it was just difficult walking but dry enough at the moment. At least for a while. Then it got more like this.
This is truly a honor. I did this as a promise to My God Mother Sylvia. She passed away from colon cancer this past march. The day I got the magazine I felt her smile at me. Along with our Sue. I can't describe the feeling but it was a bittersweet moment I will never forget.
(If you happen to see a copy of Our Best Baby Blankets somewhere I highly recommend looking through it. I'm finding it to be a great go-to book for afghans for both babies and grown-ups!)
Tomorrow, Mister Man is making his First Holy Communion tomorrow. Instead of getting ready for the party we're hosting here afterwards, I spent part of this morning going through some of the items that are slotted for the wee ones' memories boxes but haven't yet actually made it into them for some unknown reason (read: my husband hasn't gotten them off the very high shelf where they live).
*See if there is a homeschool sports league in your area for your older students who want to participate in football, basketball, baseball, etc. Often they will have fundraisers to help deflect the burden of costs to families who participate.
“W..wha?” Derrek outright stopped this time.
Clearly, there was a miscommunication there.
Under the BN, the people will be boss for a day and they will be governed for the next 5 years.
On the bright side, I have plenty of time to participate in Pitchapalooza via the World Literary Café. The Book Doctors are accepting queries in a little contest all the way until May 15. The winner’s query will be put in the hands of an agent. Hence, my new deadline is May 15. I won’t miss this one!
I went to the Weight Watchers meeting first, though. It was on the way, and the clinic wasn’t open until 2, so I had time. I walked into the meeting angry. And standing there in line I could feel how tense my shoulders were, how hunched over I was, and I thought to myself “Anger is heavy.”
to it all as I tried again and again
Monday I will start on the flower beds that run along the front of the house. Then on to the sides and backyard flower beds. Though its been a hot, sticky job I am really enjoying the work and hope the wife gets some pleasure out of them.
The people don’t have a voice
The only way the unsaved millions can see the truth is by the preaching of God’s Word. For that very reason the apostle admonished Timothy in 2 Timothy 4:2 to “preach the word.” Then, and only then, is God able to work in the heart of the unbeliever as we do what is told us in Philippians 2:16, “holding forth the word of life.”
Everything I once held dear
and some chalkboard paint.
But before this, they had been a team in vaudeville. Buddy Zolitan (b. ca. 1910) started out as one half of the dance team Bud and Buddy in the mid 1920s in an act that toured the major big time circuits. (They were only teenagers but had gotten this rare opportunity via a successful audition.) After this, he worked solo for a bit, changed his name to Howe (as in “Buddy–How He Can Dance!”) and then hooked up with a trio that also included Alyce McLaughlin (who later married Amos and Andy’s Charles Correll) and Jack E. Leonard. This act broke up around 1933, and soon after, Buddy spotted Jean Carroll, who’d already danced with a number of acts herself. They formed a versatile team that mixed comedy cross talk with dance (and pretty quickly found themselves getting married). As an act they were together from around 1935 through 1943, playing presentation houses, what was left of small time, British music halls and the U.S.O. Buddy was drafted in 1943 and that was when Jean went solo and switched to stand-up. Howe died in 1981. Carroll died in 2010, just shy of her 99th birthday, and was on the grateful end of several public tributes in her final years. There are terrific interviews with both Carroll and Howe in the book The Vaudevillians by Bill Smith.
The next big change we made also involved Little Miss. Because of her problems with encopresis and constipation (even on an adult dose of Miralax a day) we decided to try some dietary changes. Specifically, we have gone low-gluten. While we did have tests run and Little Miss does NOT have Celiac Disease, it's possible that a gluten sensitivity could be causing her issues.
Like, "momma, staple has a P in it. sstaPle... hear it?"
Kracauer, Siegfried. Theory of Film: The Redemption of Physical Reality. Princeton: Oxford University Press, 1960
The lies he kept, he kept it all from me
Now I have to add this disclaimer, I am not a quilter, nor do I claim to be. Would I love to be one? Yes! But for right now, this is as good as it gets. I wanted simple and I'm sure there are better ways to do this, but this is what I did and it worked! I actually made this quilt about 5 or 6 years ago and it has been a family favorite ever since. It has been used and abused and still has held up great!
Golden City Brewery OATis
2. Share this note on your profile. Tell your friends. If we can spread the word about our cash crisis, we can hopefully find more sales and save our literary publishing. Remember it's just one book, that's all it takes to save us. Please do it now.
It seems to be prom season, and so everywhere young people were also getting dressed up, washing cars, and going out.
Is that like, "If you see the Buddha on the road, kill him"?
Medium sweet onion, sliced
¤It resulted in a followup that came out in 2008. This time charming elements where thrown out the window for a "Need for speed" actionmovie that sadly enough got better score's than this original ever got.
Circle Punch 1 3/8 large (119860)
We were invited back Friday night for a fa-la-la-fabulous dinner party, celebrating Christ's birth with our spouses and other members of our wonderful Bible Study group. What an amazing home, and decorated with such panache and style (next week post)! Metamorphosis wonderland!
Tonight is Week 3 of Season 12′s Dancing With the Stars, and it promises to be an interesting one at that. The theme for tonight is called “Story Night”, and as a result, the couples get to choose what dance they’re doing. Here are their dances:
There was no banner,
The singer, 28, who is married to fellow country star Blake Shelton, was referring to one of her hits songs.
One cannot meaningfully declare one’s definitions of it. If one defines it with other words, that is not it. I mean by the word God this: THE fundamental linguistic unit that points to the conditionality and inherent emptiness of all other units of language.
Well I have the kids on school holidays for the next 2 weeks and as much as I love the school holidays my life will be even crazier than usual so I don't know how much scrapping I will get done! I just have to hope the sun comes out so we can spend lots of time outdoors! Don't forget there is still time to hop through this weeks Bo Bunny blog hop here for a chance to win some gorgeous Bo Bunny goodies!
This Rooibos was among the first dresses I sewed and it has held up remarkably well. It's a bit wrinkled here after a day of working, but I love the fit. I'd ideally like it to be a little longer, but it did make me feel happy to put this on and like it so much - it's good to know that I can still enjoy wearing older makes. I love the Rooibos pattern, it's a lot of fun to sew and so versatile. As the dress itself is quite plain, I opted to bling it up with these fabulous shoes:
Since coming home a month ago, things have been different. I leave work at a reasonable hour, go home and make dinner. That's shocking. For all of my love of baking and cooking, I've never been one to know how to make dinner without recipes. And needing recipes after a stressful day at work equals eating chocolate, cookies or cereal for dinner. So instead of baking (which I inexplicably am no longer motivated to do), I am learning how to make dinner without recipes.
Another tactic he has appropriated, more of a rethinking than a theft really, is one he heard first on some public radio interview on the way to Melbourne for dinner last night (not at Rockpool, will complain later when the meds wear off). There was this crazy Yank (Canuck? who can tell? who cares?) going on about denial. (E@L wished the man wasn't talking denial, seriously, he doesn't need to listen to people speaking about denial. He doesn't want to hear about it. It doesn't concern him. There is most emfatically, nothing to deny! Who, what, me? Another slice of Christmas pudding, more cream, custard, ice-cream, sure! Bring it on!)
Upon entering their space, I was immediately amazed by the spectacular marriage of industrial design and vintage objects. Spread around the studio, you could easily find a metal table close to a wooden piece from an old carousel. Every object displayed has a story and was restored or maybe even transformed into something else. Some works are the result of collaborations; others were entirely created by them - and still others were put in a context that was completely
TOTAL - 7 Books - 2,460 pages
Marcus also wanted to paint his aliens mouth red. However, it gave his alien a very scary look because it kind of looks like blood! I don't think that was his intention...although maybe it was!
In light of the things just happened to me and especially my friend’s nephew’s steady recovery. He had a very bad biking accident a couple days ago. I’d like to say thank to the Lord Almighty for continuously taking care of us and listening to our prayers.
Usually for Valentine’s day, I feel sour and sad. I used to actively dislike Valentine’s day because it reminded me of love and how I feel that I would never find it.
I've also been feeling pretty creative lately. I got this awesome bag of broken vintage jewelry at the church yard sale this past weekend. There is so much cool stuff in there- the ideas are just bubbling over as to what to make with it all! See the old cameo? I think that's my favorite!
Somehow, I've had a couple of mellow ironing sessions - just small piles - with music playing and - WOW! The ideas have come tripping along and I've had to keep dashing off to the pad to note them down.
*Duck Pond (adding numbers together)
So here’s the thing, it really doesn’t make a difference to me if they win or lose tonight because I think the bigger issue is what this means for the NBA. When teams reach incredible lows like this there are tons of questions that go throughout the mind of fans. We have seen teams in the NFL, MLB, and NHL with tough losing records but none really stand out as much as the losing records that occur in the NBA.
* Tilt Shift
- Michael Oppenheimer, Environmental Defense Fund
Many thanks to those Icelandic `infoerm`at`ionme`isters Alsie (Asmunder Jonsson) and Gunni Hjalmarsson at Bad Taste; and special thanks to Björk's mother Hildur Hauksdottir. Thanks also to Dave Wilson for his help and for supplying the bulk of the illustrations, and to Phil Deere, Derek Birkett and One Little Indian Records.
who has five loaves and two fishes. That’s something, but what are five
Contact me at kailey.jensen257@gmail.com if you have questions or want more information, would love to talk to you more!
Here's a brief excerpt of a scene between Frances and her mother to give you a feeling for the quality of the writing and for Frances' personality. Mother is getting things together for Frances's sister's birthday, and Frances is working through her jealousy by pretending to prepare a party for an imaginary pal:
time-slot. And so it was for Ronan back in 2009 when he was just 10.
Yes I am still talking about my damn house. You can't stop me!!
The termination lump sum, which is not subject to tax, is the equivalent of about two months salary.
The unit, staffed by a dozen or so detectives, traces the flow of foreign politicians’ money through London, and is funded by the UK government’s Department for International Development, which also delivers aid to Africa.
Ribbon is Do Crafts and was purchased from Craftaholic Supplies.
when we poison your sacred blood with lethal dosages of our greed.
I believe satan is afraid of the damage he’s facing because I have finally accepted Gods, conviction to spiritually mature and take my relationship to the next level with Him, Satan saw a way to exploit my weakness but because he, doesn’t know the desires of the heart he, had no clue I would call upon God, for help, because every other time I would just give in… After I called upon God, for help I heard God, whisper to seek prayer from other christian’s so I did just that!!!
(I’ve been behind on the blog front. I’ve just started Week 4. Always running after myself…)
*Verdict-Learn To Listen&Consider The Wisdom Of Those ARound You Regardless Of Age, Nationality, Or Status For Progression Is Possible Only In Admitting We ARen’t “There” Yet. Why Would We Desire To Be? For THE MOMENT WE UNDERSTAND ALL MYSTERIES IS THE SECOND WE EXHALE OUR INEXORABLE LAST.
I have used papers from "simple stories" called "fabulous". Cardstock, heart punch, scallop punch, circle punch, pearls from Stampin Up. Glitter paper & brad from "Dear Lizzy". Other product used paper doily.
Overall… 2 1/2 ♥ (hearts) out of 5.
Consider each item carefully. Do you really need it, or will it just end up at the bottom of a drawer? Packaging, waste, and pollution are the hidden costs behind nearly everything we purchase. Just think of how long all of those impulse items will linger in a landfill. Get inspired to make a difference by watching The Story of Stuff at www.storyofstuff.com.
My grandmother was not an educated woman. She left school at an age that would be illegal by today’s standards to get married and start a family. I only had a few short years to know her but from memories and the stories of others I can tell you: my grandma knew things! She knew how to cook like the Iron Chef! She could keep a clean house, catch and clean her own fish, and put my grandfather in his place, even on his worst days (and this was a man who once came home drunk in the middle of the night with a live turkey thinking she’d be HAPPY that he brought it home). All grandmas (well, ok. There may be the exception to every rule but… let’s go with the positive side of things, shall we?) are awesome. They are graduates of motherhood. They made it through to the other side. My totally unbiased opinion was that my grandma (AKA “The Good Cooker”) was the most fabulously awesome granny in the whole universe.
...Colonel Horatio Quinn...
First, I’ll start from THE beginning when I first got the calling. I was 14 and just saved. The day was July 22, 1998 and I was at the same bible camp I had gone to for the past few years. Not knowing what was going on, I went home with the usual spiritual high and shrugged off the call to witness and minister to the lost. I was 14…what kind of 14 year old totes about and witnesses? All I cared about was baseball cards, my GT bmx bike and trying to figure out creative ways to “get by” in school without getting in trouble by the man. I made it through my tweens as a lukewarm Christian, not denying God’s existence but not caring if He did exist. As I entered into my twenties, considering my future…I did what any misguided, angry, spiritually confused 21 year old would do. I joined the Marines. An honorable ambition, right? Not knocking anyone who joins, in fact, for those who have sacrificed their lives and those who have and are serving, THANK YOU! Moving on…let’s suffice it to say, that God had other plans, than for me to be a career Marine as my grandfather was (R.I.P. Papa). Shortly after joining, I was on a bus out of the depot on my way back to Washington, greeted by familiar faces. Not sure what to do, I started back into my old job painting and restoration. I could only toy around with that for so long before I needed to get a real job with bennies and stability, things my current job didn’t have. That’s when I got introduced to Platt. In a hurting economy, they hired me on. And, like everyone else who started for the company, I was introduced to delivery boy. Great opportunity to meet some awesome people and get a glimpse of how electrical product was being used. I soaked it up. All of it. I learned and rose to warehouse and eventually saw myself up front and then even to my own desk and phone!
Do you have any advice for unpublished authors trying to navigating this ever-changing publishing world?
Every once in a blue moon, i will check my junk email folder and see what type of email ends up in never never land. Surprise, surprise – one of it was from Intercontinental Hotel! Now, some of you may not know who or where this hotel is : remember NIKKO HOTEL ? Yes, the Nikko Hotel group sold off their business to Intercontinental.
But, just like there are “white collar criminals” there are “white collar abusers.” The abuse can be emotional torture or psychological terror. The scars are hidden and hard to heal. As the Borderline matures the parent(s) will give excuses for their behavior and try to “con” the child into accepting this abuse as just another aspect of life. No. There isn’t any excuse for abusing or neglecting a child.
like that…
Avocado and Grapefruit Salad with Shrimp
2 teaspoons chili powder
Gold: Kickstart Stout, Barley Brothers Brewery & Grill, Lake Havasu City, AZ
Nat Geo France 04/26/2011 20:40
Lightning flashed and he saw her figure shift. It wasn’t her anymore. His mind pulled out from the memories long lost to death, and he started to remember.
This is a pet subject of mine, I'm currently at University doing a degree in 'Community Regeneration and Development' so I'm fully aware of how bad things are for the more disadvantaged in our society. I could go on for page after page, but I'd better give someone else a turn!!!
Well, that's all for now!
A god, when it appears
I put a lot of boxes and containers in a pile for the attic.
Her: Ohhh (really flirty) I could use a check up. You should give me one.
But... I'm not kidding about God being good, all the time. Right after I posted our money status, I got home to find a check that I had written to one of the hospitals had been returned, uncashed, because our insurance had picked up the bill.
Aaaaaand when the power came back.... we were without internet.... without cable tv.... without satellite tv.....
My deeds are all Thine own drawn close to Thee,
But diversity should be about more than just skin color, which is superficial – we all look the same under a microscope. I think college and universities need to expand their notion of diversity to include ideological and class diversity. Diversity of thought is important. Ever read those college guides that depict a school as a leftist haven, or a squeaky clean young republican resort? And there’s the school where everybody smokes and the one where everyone drives a SUV with a ski rack and looks straight out of a designer catalog. And the one where all the students hold hands and pray before lunch. Let’s not forget the Birkenstock wearing atheists at the school with no degree requirements. These of
swimming in calm seas of wonder
Heat the olive oil in a skillet on medium. Dredge the pork patties in flour, then dip in egg mixture, and finally dip in the breadcrumbs mixed with paprika. Place the patties in the hot oil immediately (otherwise the breading will get soggy). Fry the patties for 2-3 minutes per side, and make sure to cut one open to check that the pork is cooked all the way through. Once cooked, place the patties on a plate on top of a paper towel to soak up the excess grease. They should be a golden brown color.
We already knew by this time last year that the school needed to move elsewhere. I think we'd already started talking to our friends at the Fremont Baptist Church, from whom we now lease rooms, but nothing was finalized until mid-May. We were moved by the first week of June, a monumental task for our community, one that called all hands on deck and included the building of our new outdoor classroom in time for the start of our summer sessions. There have been times when we've looked around during the past couple months and wondered why we've not made more progress on things like building our new teaching garden or erecting more walls to turn our windmill into a proper play house, but yesterday as we made our first foray as a community to the actual shores of the lake, I was reminded that we, by all rights, ought to be still catching our collective breaths.
This is one on my mum’s favourite recipe and it is a must have dish during festival season. She is at her eighties and can still dish out good Accar for the family. The way she manages the balance of sweetness, sourness and saltiness of the dish to perfection amazes me. I guess she must have got it right through years of experience. Mum’s cooking is the best!
Love has it's way of working magic and within two years we married. On the day we married, we departed for a life in Sydney and so the story began. During the past 25 years we had a 10 year break back in America..the rest have been spent overseas. We have now spent more time overseas than in our home country which puts us in a very tricky situation. Where is home?
Well, not really.
"Bugsy, whaddaya doin'?"
Housing projects are an architects everyday business. Housing is one of the really big architectural challenges as it more than many other tasks directly represents an idea of being and enabling to unfold and arrange. The society and social implication of architecture is the most direct while designing how the individuals life their everyday lives.
10. PlumChoice
Basically when you think of Dosa, you will naturally think of the Rice, Urad dal combo that's ground and fermented to be used. Apart from that, there are so many Instant Dosas that can be made and enjoyed. I almost thought I might not be able to do the BM this time as I didn't have anything ready. So I had to fall back on this no fermented Dosa, and then plan for other versions.
Have you ever read the ingredients list back there?
Meanwhile, prepare cream cheese filling:
I hope he or she wasn't eaten by any of the neighborhood cats, and since it was another ten years or so before I got my own cat, Orson... Well, at least I don't have that thought on my conscience.
1) Obama's people have indeed produced a document which states he was born in Hawaii. However, the document is not what those who produced it claim that it is. The web-sites which proudly display (or have at some point proudly displayed) the document, such as Fight the Smears and FactCheck.org refer to the document as “Obama's birth certificate” by doing so they are deliberately misleading the public. The document in question is not a birth certificate or a certificate of live birth it is a “Certification of live birth” which carries different weight legally and, even if authenticated, is not, on its own sufficient to provide definitive proof of citizenship.
"We want to pass on our heartfelt values to our precious children. Isn't this ultimately why we decide to homeschool? Somehow, we all come to the point of realization that someone else is impressing their values on our priceless children; that we are being robbed of the most important privilege of parenthood. Our belief in Jesus Christ is our most valuable possession and if, day in and day out, our children are being taught values that counter biblical principles; then there is surely cause for alarm." - Diane Hopkins
Now has 4 points, with the first now being, 1. His Proper Time. Understand this friends. Because once you know that God is a God of order and is perfect in all things, you’ll grasp things in a different way. He orchestrated how and when I got these truths in His proper time because He knew how I could respond to them. He met me where I was at! How beautiful and creative indeed! His methods of approaching and counseling leave me in awe!
I have found that quarterly meetings are the best for keeping happy participants. More often than that can get overwhelming quickly and less often and people get out of the routine. I liked February, May, September, and early November. It misses the summertime and major holidays and if that's what you always do, people will know to gauge their time accordingly.
The car has an unfortunate design fault in that being a ubiquitous non-flash family mover and shaker, it is roughly the size and shape of a small tank and fails to take into account the fact that small drivers will have the seat rammed up against the steering wheel in order to reach the pedals which means the buttons to operate the windows are not immediately obvious – this is a long winded way of saying that I often absentmindedly open the back windows rather than the front. This particular habit is fine normally as the only consequence is that the drama queens just get an unexpected blast of fresh air, however when you have a pair of tinsel festooned antlers attached by dint of being wedged into the rear window then what happens is they fall off. Unable to bear the humiliation of being that woman in the shrek car with only one antler I then have to pull up and hurl myself through the traffic and retrieve the battered antler with what I hope is a casual and sophisticated air designed to cloak the farcical and humiliating nature of the errand.
"Screecher seats"?
I hope everyone had a wonderful and merry Christmas. The kids enjoyed theirs and have been enjoying the break from school too. They each got one big present and then 3 small presents so they really enjoyed it. We had Christmas morning on Christmas eve morning so we could have breakfast with my Mom and siblings. I made an egg casserole bake that was really good and a different take on fruit salad too. I got the recipes from Northpole.com. I'll post the recipes at the end of this blog. We also had monkey bread but it was frozen not homemade. We exchanged gifts with them. Jessie got one of the Glee soundtracks and a Bruno Mars CD. Nicky got a $25 gift card from Game Stop and so did Chris. They gave me a $25 Amazon card. I finally got to spend it last night. I got a book in the Remy Chandler series by Thomas E. Sniegoski that both Chris and I like, a movie called Gabriel that stars Andy Whitfield of Spartacus fame (he passed away much too young) and a cookbook I've been wanting forever called What Can I Bring? written by the Cake Mix Doctor cookbook lady. I just had to put about $5 with it to cover it all so that wasn't too bad. We headed to Mother in Law's house after breakfast and got to Marshall around 3 p.m. We had a really good visit with her and for the first time ever got to have Christmas dinner with her and Brother in Law and his family on Christmas day. It wasn't a long visit with him because he had to go back to Oklahoma where he's working temporarily while waiting for a job to come open at Eastman Kodak in Marshall. I hope that job comes through soon. I can't stand the idea that they might move to Oklahoma and we won't get to see them anymore. But anyway, that's not my business. We went to his house on Monday and hooked up on wifi there. Jessie got a tablet and Mother in Law got a Kindle (from us) so she was downloading free books through Amazon. Chris and Nicky went to Game Stop to spend their Christmas gift cards and cash while we played online. After that we went to McDonalds and treated everybody. They have the free wifi there so Mom kept downloading books there too. LOL. She loves her Kindle. My Mom got a Kindle from my sister and them and she loves it too. I just don't know if I'm ready to give up my real books yet. We left on Tuesday and got home around 1 p.m. It was a nice trip and good to see family but it seemed really fast. We're celebrating New Year's with my Mom and them tomorrow. We're grilling steaks and my sister Cheryl is making the sides (mashed potatoes, cabbage and black eyed peas). It should be a really good and tasty dinner. I hope everyone has a wonderful and Happy New Year!
Hartikainen AL, Sorri MS, Anttonen H, Tuimala R, Läärä E. Effect of occupational noise on the course and outcome of pregnancy. Scand J Work Environ Health 1994; 6: 444-450.
I'm torn between exploring and helping Rowan get used to his new home--which means being home, decorating, giving it our energy, and following the bedtime routine that we've gotten used to. So while part of me really wants to go camping, I'm secretly glad I can blame Rowan and just nest.
But I don’t even see newspapers scattered about in coffee shops or pubs anymore, so what’s to pick up?
Price: Moderate. Willing to negotiate a price on items that haven't been marked yet, and I got a 10% discount on a skirt that had lost some buttons. (They don't take American Express)
Bingo Alphabet stamp set
It is a Squigglefly challange once again! This week I choose to do a sketch & a recipe of RED/GLITTER/HEARTS! Visit the Squigglefly Blog
One, if by lunchtime on the first day people didn't think it was worth twice what they paid, they could have their money back plus travel expenses. Two, that you simply will not find any group of speakers of this calibre anywhere in the world. Nobody disagreed or wanted a refund.
Second, a good Hokkien Mee can’t be presented without pork lard. Pork lard is a key ingredient in cooking Hokkien Mee, Hokkien mee without pork lard - the dish will lost its soul.
Every tourist takes their picture here. It's kind of nice the way there's the blank space you can stand in. I tried to look like an enthusiastic tourist. Instead I think I just looked kind of goofy. And you can't tell but I was wearing an Apple t-shirt just for this photo op but instead of seeing the logo you can see my stomach. Total fail.
1 in 4 people now access the internet on their smartphones. Sales of laptops and iPads are rocketing, often as a second computer alongside an existing desktop PC. In my opinion, every website should be increasing its unique user figures each month without doing anything extra, just through the new ways in which readers are accessing it.
Then let pie sit in refrigerator for the afternoon. That’s it ! (I put toasted coconut on top and served it with whipped cream).
Veggies and fruits are an important part of everyone’s diet in special if you eat lot’s of grilled food. They contain dozens of important nutrients and anti carcinogens besides dietary fiber. Just by getting five to nine servings as your daily quota , you help build your body’s shield and contribute for your immunity against diabetes, blood pressure, cancer and heart disease.
Here is what is up for grabs.
Supporting the spiritual trajectory of a decade's counterculture has never been the strong suit of mainstream Hollywood. Take, for instance, the cinematic output of the 1980s. You can scour the frames of countless motion pictures that were made during that particular period of time and still come up empty in terms of finding era specific examples of the fashion, music, sexuality, and interior design that helped shape the Zeitgeist. The people in charge of making these movies clearly had no real interest in the chromatic explosion that was happening all around them. It's true, there were a handful of directors, costumers, and production designers who understood the full magnitude of what was going down. But for the most part, the film's reek of misguided nostalgia and broken dreams. If the bland and the feckless amongst filmmaking elite weren't going to remove their collective heads from the gaping asshole known as "the sixties" and properly capture the essence of the fingerless glove decade, who would? Pornographers! That's fucking who. The unsavoury world of pornography may have a lot going against it: wanton drug abuse, suspect production values, wonky acting skills, and scene after scene of unappealing double penetration action to name slightly more than a few. But when it comes to crystallizing what it meant to be alive in the 1980s, you should look no further than your average adult film made between 1980 and 1989.
Nothing can beat, when rear wheel goes flat at 90kph and nothing happens to you.
You've whittled down your gift buying list to a manageable size, and you know exactly what you're going to get for the people left on the list.
Now go enter-hehe.
It is interesting to note that I know there's lots of stomach flu going around town, and when I went to the grocery store this morning there were only a couple of bottles of Welch's Grape Juice left on the top shelf. I had to climb onto the lower rack to reeeeach the last ones way at the back. Seems to me like other people are buying stock in it as well. If the whole thing is a myth, it would be a very cleverly construed one by the Welch's company, since they seem to be the only brand with the 100% grape juice!
My name is Z, I am the writer and photographer behind this blog and I look forward to embarking on this journey with you.
President Taft. from Washington late this afternoon, directed the secretary of the navy to order the scout cruisers Salem and Chester from Hampton roads to meet the Carpathia and send by wireless to the government a. complete li«t of the Titanic's survivors. The Chester was caught by wireless about 40 miles off the Chesapeake capes and by 4 o'clock was steaming northward at 20 knots an hour, aiming to get as quickly as possible into touch with steamers having news bearing on the disaster.
The moment he drove in, I met him. “Vernon was killed.” He collapsed over his steering wheel and started shaking. “The doctor wants us to go immediately to the hospital to identify his body.”
I take her gently by the arm and she drifts along beside me, so lightly I may as well have tied a helium balloon to my elbow, a character shape from the new, grimly-realistic Urban Collection: Bad Tripper, from the Heebeegeebee range.
Here in the future,
You probably remember that back in January, I decided to do project 10 pan – skincare edition due to the fact that I had more skin care products that one girl should really owns. (You can click here for more information on that blog post)
So to ease her mind a little bit, I suggested she call my sister Joanne, who lives just a few streets from the movie theatre. My sister agreed to make sure that I made it to the theatre safely and back.
Psst: I can't stop thinking HOLIDAYS! I've already starting planning and shopping from; what tree to get, went to HOB LOB to find new Christmas decorations since they are on sale. Oh and I ordered some Christmas presents last week and they are hiding in the basement TeeHee
09. Pulse Of The Maggots
We were soon off and Aaron soon found his rhythm, though it did lack consistency, the wee man did very well. We hugged the jagged coiffed coast then crossed a narrow passage to a small island that was the host to a colony of Shags. Beautiful birds that reminded me of cormorants and as noisy as fish wives. They were particularly clumsy on land but in the air and in the sea they were graceful. Occasionally they would swoop down from their vantage points to take a closer look at the weird monkeys paddling by. As with all birds in New Zealand the seemed to be fearless of humans and often came very close to the kayaks. The smell of Shag guano is pretty pungent though and it hit us in wafts as the wind died and the sun heated it up.
A few weeks ago I was invited along to 'The Show' at the Bullring Shopping Centre, where I took my seat at the end of the catwalk situated within the mall with my sister Hailey and the lovely Fritha from Fish Tank Fashion. The mini-fashion show showcased what the UK High Street had to offer in what is now, a yearly fashion event for the Bullring. This particular spot is also where TV stylist and haberdashery lover (well I had to say it!), Gok Wan likes to put on his roadshows. The show itself featured brands that were available in the shopping mecca that is The Bullring. They also played with the idea of the hologram and a screen at the end of the catwalk displayed images of Tiffany Pisani (winner of 6th Cycle, Britain's Next Top Model) appearing alongside the live models who strutted their stuff down the runway.
darkness devoured by blackout,
Trying to figure out an appropriate diet snack, I came out with a great solution: oatmeal cookies. Full of fiber, they sounded like a satisfying option to curb my sugar cravings. Considering this, I logged on to Foodbuzz and scanned several recipes until I found something I liked. And the winners are: apple oatmeal and peanut butter-chocolate oatmeal.
New Yorkers thought it might be worse. The storm system began the previous day as a blinding Midwestern blizzard, paralyzing the railroad and killing cattle. St. Louis received its greatest snowfall ever up to that time from this churning storm, and Chicago reported winds of up to 50 miles per hour. If it held this pattern by the time it hit the East, New Yorkers feared another storm of the level of the Blizzard of 1888, which buried the city in snow, rendered transportation useless, and killed more than 200 people.
than just cards and scrapbook pages. We want to show them a wide variety
#165 Adrian Beltre (Dodgers)
Heaven is: listening to Bach's cello suites on a silent beach while jumping on an Olympic trampoline. The world is the motion and the visual and the music.
This wasn’t exactly a denial of the possibility that it could buy Khazanah’s stake and simply not sell it.
The mother, more that a little surprised, asked fearfully, "That's interesting. How do you make babies?"
About a month ago three of my grandchildren, all girls (age 2, 3 & 4) came to stay for a few days. Because of all their antics, which kept us adults chuckling most of the time, they as well as their parents reminded me of the 1950′s sitcoms. As a grandmother this happened to make me feel rather good. It made me feel hopeful that my granddaughters’ adult lives would be a happy ones.
The mama decided to ride Daisy a bit at this point and I took her place on the bleachers. I warned her that she was uber lazy and didn't neck rein, but she still came back saying how lazy she was! ;) She got her to trot a few times and the last time she tripped so she said that was all she did of that (her hooves are long!) I also got to talk to the farrier about her hoof and he said it was just long and needed a trim, yeah! I got his card and will be calling him today to set up an appointment. He said he charges $40.00 for barefoot. This is about right for around here. What are yalls prices?
Are you one of the many women (or men) who asks for “marriage” when what you really want is “love”?
She would later be told Jo died on a train after having his wrists tied above his head without food or water for ten days. She returned home to find all of the rice they had hidden had been taken by the police. The kids were hungry, and her mom had been watching them.
3. My wedding related goal is super vague, but the goal is to have at least 3 items on my checklist marked off and report back to you what I’ve accomplished them!
I exalt the Bible as the infallibly-inspired Word of God and as the SOLE authority for faith and practice. I would rather cut off my right hand than add my frail human thinking or traditions as an authority equal to Scripture. I have pleaded with God for 40 years to keep me from such a great sin, and I have continually re-examined my doctrinal beliefs to conform them to the light of Scripture.
﻿ you get tickets.
To GMA's credit, they brought Chris and Phil to their studio and allowed a true discussion to take place (short though it was) and cleared up some of the misconceptions about unschooling and in particular, about their children Kimi and Shaun. It was a much better look at unschooling even without video footage of children in action.
I am just one person
Hello! Just finished up this beauty... I am loving this digital image from Pure Innocence this year. I think it might be the only image I've used twice so far. I don't think my first attempt at white on white did the image justice, so I thought I'd put her in pretty pink this week. I've done several blue and white cards, and although I love that combination, I also am loving the pink-white-silver I have seen on other crafters' cards over the past month. Plus I wanted something soft and feminine for the friend for whom this is intended. =)
And all of a sudden they finally found the solution. And the solution is exactly what you'll be buying right now. You'll probably think: "Oh, great, another classic and boring bed sheet" and you'll immediately think of something like this:
Need: Orange construction paper balled up to be the fire.
So, I guess I’ve been practicing community building all along and when we finally start to travel and live in new places, I’ll use my Starbucks experience – Be the first to smile. Always say hello. Never miss an opportunity to talk to a stranger – you’ll hear the most interesting stories. Take the comfy chair and sit awhile. Relax and enjoy.
Today is the third day of my DT post for Tsunami Rose! Today's sketch was a real challenge for me for some reason I couldn't figure out what I wanted to do and it is such a simple design but I wanted to do something different and than what I would normally do but I prevail and here it is and go check it out! :)...thanks to Daisy who does these wonderful sketches for us each day...we will be doing one everyday so please check in everyday and I have email that you can sign up for to keep up...hehe...and don't forget to check out the Tusnami Rose blog! :) Don't forget to check out the FB Page as well...great stuff! :)
Since my modelling skills aren’t great, I will be making good use of YouTube tutorials and online forums and blogs to guide me through the design process of creating a 3D model of a character and weapon. (If all goes well and I advance on this project quicker than I expect to, I will also attempt to animate the model).
Then as I walked out of the CR, I took a slight glance over the pantry and I couldn’t believe sa nakita ko- ISANG COFEEE MACHINE and wait here it comes……GUMAGANA!!!
Airi has been doing this for a while, and she could fold one in less than a minute and 50 seconds! Impressive.
I colored the image with prismacolor pencils and gamsol. Layered it over some marina mist cardstock and a spellbinders rectangle die. Used a Cherry Lynn flourish die under that panel and then another marina mist panel with designer paper.
Gary really wasn’t all that bad. Only naughty. Miss Shoemaker didn’t like dirty hands, and his were always grubby. She didn’t like messy desks, and his always looked like it had been stirred up with a muddy stick. He forgot his homework, chewed gum in class, and stuck out his tongue at her behind her back. The worst thing I ever remember him doing is asking various girls what coloured panties they were wearing. At least, to me, at ten years old, that was quite shockingly bad.
I responded to this remark with the same light-hearted quip that Butch Cassidy had used to defuse a similar situation.
And here is a little picture you might find over there. Our crazy family trying hard to look mentally stable for a moment.
With much admiration,
We will arise united as compatriots for our beloved
The U.S./NATO war on Afghanistan is opposed by the people of the world. Tens of thousands of Afghans have been killed. Thousands of U.S. soldiers and marines have been killed or wounded. According to a New York Times poll, 69% of people in the United States think all U.S. troops should leave Afghanistan immediately.
This is the first fleece diaper I sewed forever ago. (And by forever, I really mean a couple months.)
Postmaster General and CEO Patrick R. Donahoe said in part last week: “…we’ve listened to our customers in rural America and we’ve heard them loud and clear—they want to keep their post office open. We believe today’s announcement will serve our customers’ needs and allow us to achieve real savings to help the Postal Service return to long-term financial stability.”
Sitting there watching his son, Willard suddenly had an intense desire to pray. Though he hadn't talked to God in years, not a single petition or word of praise since he'd come across the crucified marine during the war, he could feel it welling up inside him now, the urge to get right with his Maker before something bad happened to his family. But looking around the cramped apartment, he knew he couldn't get in touch with God here, no more than he'd ever been able to in a church. He was going to need some woods to worship his way.But it will be a battle. Willard's fraught relationship with God will be tested by drink, disease and death; his search for 'peace and calm' constantly threatened. The personal relationship with God is one theme that unites the novel's characters and it will gve you an idea of the diversity of them if I mention quickly a pair of preachers, a serial-killing couple and a priest with a taste for young flesh.
The Home Office plans were opposed by child protection campaigners and Conservative MPs, who said some offenders could never be considered completely “safe”. The new rules were drawn up because the Supreme Court ruled that automatic lifetime inclusion on the register breached the Human Rights Act.
Tessa is getting reading help at school...without us even having to fight for an IEP. I've met with the teacher and reading specialist about it. We are more then just a little bit happy to see this happening because we are going down the road to look for diagnoses that could help get her "identified" (if she needs to be) at school, but it's going to take a while to get through it all. Now-if only she responds positively to this help (they say she is thus far). It could change the entire course of her education if she does.
and in that simple manner we have found our enquivalent
Pattern: Baby Surprise Jacket
There are things at which it excels, such as getting into places that a router can't reach. Scratch stock also enables you to create your own profiles and saves you from having to buy expensive router bits.
Three years ago Lexi Strauss was an ordinary freshman girl at Covington High. She had a dramaholic, boy-crazy best friend that she adored. And her biggest dilemma was figuring out how to get Xander, her older brother’s gorgeous best friend, to see her as more than just “Little Lexi.”First, let me start by saying that opening line is a grabber. It's filled with descriptive elements without being overwritten or overly wordy. It also has the right tone for a YA query, the same tone that I'd want to see in the book itself, using words and phrases that will resonate with younger readers. The query letter needs to be indicative of what the book will be, and having the right tone is important.
And it might get destroyed on any one of the upcoming stormy days (HOORAY for some chances to bust out my scarves, sweaters, and boots!!!), but that will just add to its charm, right?
So, now, as my hit numbers finally start to fall back to their normal pathetic counts, I’m left to wonder, what caused this perfect storm of viewers flocking to my little profanity-riddled, scatologically-obsessed blog? Was it the tagging of “Whitney Houston”? Or the one-two combo punches of “Whitney Houston” coupled with “drugs” or “addict”?
His wand, his power—but wisely spared his life.’
Looking a little more closely at the detail of the measures used:
"Brigham Young. He was the spiritual successor to Joseph Smith."
Just keep your mind open, after all it may be all you need, not drugs.
Which is why we value Chip so greatly as a critic. Teaching students how to literally read between the lines is simply part of his duty as a teacher. But that final sentence is a speculation that opens vistas. Ever since, I've been thinking about the Bible and Gilgamesh and most especially the works of Homer and what I'm not seeing when I read them.
Now, for the really interesting stuff!
Stooges - Fun House (expanded) - 1970
It came out looking pretty…mushy. And brown. It tasted good, but I don’t think I’ll be submitting this one to the contest. It just kind of looks, well…gross. I think I was wrong to attempt to make meatloaf into something besides what it is–there are some things you just don’t mess with, and Mom’s meatloaf might be on that list. (Along with the leftover coq au vin in my fridge–that’s pretty much meant to be eaten straight.)
I've been thinking how to do this and decided on a series--Souvenirs de la France--memories of my recent trip. Like this view from my hotel balcony in Paris. I loved being on the top floor with its birdseye view, here looking down Rue Chevert toward Avenue de la Motte-Picquet.
lighter area
Then the passage of time rubs off the rough edges. By the third and fourth generation, no one remembers. No one is taught.
-William Blake
Of sun and shadow.
Guinsoo: The ones that get past the picks and bans screen.
-$1/1 TRESemme Styling Product, (RP 07/31/11)
3. Me and My Arrow
And feeling good, smile and simply be honest. “No, thanks, Mary. I'm just not in the mood for a lunch today.”
I made the scones in the evening and cut them into 16 small squares. I put them on this 1/4 sheet pan and wrapped it tightly with plastic wrap. Then I froze them overnight. In the morning, you can just pop them in the oven (spread out on two 1/2 sheet pans) for a little longer than the recipe's recommended baking time. In my rush, I forgot to put the egg wash and sanding sugar on the scones before baking so your finished scone may look a bit different.
I had to scratch some things when I looked at the price of the flights and stuff. But I ended up deciding I’m going to Maine some time in May! And hopefully Philadelphia in the beginning of June. I just have to figure it out with my host family. Fingers crossed!
If you give the glass a bit of a swirl and get some foam forming you get a decent aroma of all sorts of stuff going on; chocolate, honey, burnt toast, sticky resinous hops, roasted malt and raisins. If you let it settle down a bit you start to get more of, an almost smoky, woody aroma - just enough to give an essence of a Rauch Beer.
Beeld article
We have lost a great man. Who will take up the fight that he was fighting? Who will stand up for those who can not stand up for themselves? Who will fight to make sure our rights are protected? Who will be the next man of integrity? I pray that we do not have to wait long. However, I pray that we don't just wait for the next man of integrity to come. We also have an accounting for our actions before God. We need to fight for our rights. We need to trust God to lead us and use us in the battle before us as we are going to be facing more and more battles. We live in a world that is against us and an enemy who is fighting to make sure that we fail. God is mighty. God is powerful and God will win – with or without us. I would rather be a part of this fight than not.
6. What The World Needs Now Is Love
latent heat. The hot-spots in the mantle would thus use about 10% of the tidal
Pa: “You never know if you move next door to a meth lab…”
So that’s week 1. I’ll try harder next week, I promise!!!
Police said she began having sexual conversations with each victim and eventually sent them nude photos of herself.
Cricut Cartridge Country Life Hen 2, page 44 (Base, Shift, Layer 1 Base, Layer 1 Shift and Layer 2 Base)
good intentions for tomorrow
And by that I mean, they've accepted it knowingly or not. It probably takes some exposure to Buddhism or Taoism or some other Eastern -ism to understand radical acceptance on a cognitive level. But there are those who've never breathed an om in their life, and yet still manage to bring this air of, "I wouldn't change anything" wherever they go.
Store at room temperature in an airtight container.
far off in the distance, you see
BEST TELEVISION EPISODE TELEPLAY
“When you will kill me?”
After lunch, it was still drizzling, but I asked again after the owls. They’re back in the jungle, he told me. In the jungle or in the tree? I asked. In the jungle. I put on my raincoat and rushed over, expecting to find three wet owls shivering to death on the jungle floor. Instead, I ran into the dai who had played host to sano kukura checking the night before. We put them on the jungle floor, he told me. Then they flew up to their nest. Then their mother brought them a snack.
Then there are the ones that are more technically minded. The ones that love the diseases, the machines, the procedures, the lab values, and of course they kinda like the people too.
not a florist or flower market anywhere
Even the increase in allocations from the federal government to Sabah from RM2.7 billion to RM20 billion has made little difference, he said.
It is great - as a blogger, I've got boards to organize helpful sites for my blog (broken link checker, Google Analytics, etc), favorite places to list giveaways, and other resources, as well as boards to Clip the reviews I've done for products and books. As a Mom, I've got some great boards for kids crafts, games, and ideas of places to go in our area.
By setting the “Level of Expectation”, your Dealership will quickly become proficient, consistent and professional!
I set down the empty metal tin in the folds of my robe. Confession time.
In the early Eighties Monsignor Marcinkus used his status to avoid being questioned by police probing the collapse of a Banco Ambrosiano which the Vatican had invested heavily in.
I see First Contact Day celebrations as being in a similar vein, just with fewer gold coins, more beads, and more boobies.
He said if you take this step this is what I will do, then take the step and see what He will do. But when He says take this step this is what I will do and then you do contrary to what He says, how can you expect you will continue to rise.
At the same time as he panders to misplaced populist sentiment, Farron accuses the Tories for doing just that after the Riots. If there's one person that reflects what needs to change with the LibDems it's Farron. They can't outflank Red Ed's Labour on the Left. They need to show they are a grown up party with a genuine liberal economic and social outlook. I think Clegg understands this, but he needs to slap down the likes of Farron and other reform blockers on the left. If he does, his party can emerge transformed in 2015 with a different make up of supporters, but with a lot more credibility.
Look, we are people not urban. We’re not defined by where we live. Unless you’re out milking cows and pumping water from a well, we all live in the City. A City. Any City.
Elaine Myra Greenberg, 56, New York, N.Y.
Friday night was one of THOSE NIGHTs in our household. We'd gone to a 4H dinner, a casual event attended by many sponsors of 4H -- many of whom just happen to be elderly people. And my boys were, well, boys. They laughed loudly. They got up and down off their chairs. They told fart jokes. They got into squabbles with one another that required re-direction. But in the midst of all that, our county director leaned over to me and said (with a smile on her face!), "I just love your boys' enthusiasm!"
I don't know a single agent other than a scam artist who says that. Not one.
The story is called "Barbarian With a Gun" and it is awesome. Written by Chuck Dixon, one of my favorite comic book writers, and illustrated (pencils and inks) by John Buscema, it seemed a win-win without really even trying. But try and succeed it did. The story is typical Punisher, except that instead of the dirty streets of New York, the action takes place in fictitious sub-tropical island nation known as Puerto Dulce. Through the story Frank is put to the test. He is beaten, shot at, and otherwise abused. But through it all he perseveres in typically stoic Punisher fashion. The story also boasts some great dialogue with Microchip, Frank's nerdy computer-whiz sidekick, and a guest star from Marvel's comic The 'Nam, Iceman. The ending is a pretty cool piece of irony.
Cheese: Sharp Blue, Cheddar
What about other areas of need? Dr. David Gushee once challenged a group of students at McAfee School of Theology to choose one ethical issue to become their cause of choice. There are so many injustices in our world, no one person can address them all. Choose one. So, that day, I chose hunger. How do I follow my calling in the area of hunger justice issues? I have in the past volunteered in food ministries. I wrote a sermon for class on hunger. What can I do now?
It of course didn’t hurt that these were 7 points that I totally agree with Anthony on.
When we see Jesus, coming in glory,
Sean Combs, formerly known as Puff Daddy, also known as P Diddy, King Combs and Puffy, was known in Tweetland as “Swag” for a week. (I am merely reporting information, not mocking. The man knows how to design a suit !)
They are only part of what he left behind and that list is endless. The tributes have just begun. It is the only topic of import today in beer blogs, on beer discussion boards and in various e-mail lists.
I'm not afraid to bribe.
And now? The war is forgotten, all but airbrushed from our history. They’re not mentioned in Remembrance Day services, those soldiers who endured so much. Their memorials fall into decay, and the one in Beeston near Nottingham serves only to make schoolchildren giggle when they read the legend ‘Died of Diarrhoea’. No-one writes about them. Everyone here can think of several novels about Waterloo – but name just two about the Charge of the Light Brigade. Name one.
We have believed such ridiculous solutions because our perception has been blunted by some portion of denial and despair. And those are legitimate reactions. I’m not persuading anyone out of them. The question is, do we want to develop a strategy to manage our emotional state or to save the planet?
ESTIMATED INITIAL TSUNAMI WAVE ARRIVAL TIMES AT FORECAST POINTS
These two verses however, cannot abrogate the 119 other verses of Qur’an that suggest that Jihad is not merely limited to defensive war alone. These 119 verses, which are general and absolute, indicate that Jihad encompasses all of the following types of war:
The writer of the piece, former Wall Street Journal ad columnist Briain Steinberg, points out how smaller newspaper staffs have affected coverage -- and also on how the changing nature of the ad biz itself took what was once a navel-gazing industry into the broader technological world. But, to get more specific, the thing that most stands out to me about how ad coverage has changed is that what constitutes news is entirely different than what it was, say, 20 years ago, during the last few years of what might be considered the "old" industry.
Thanks for watching!!
Zombies, as you may have learned from William Seabrook’s writings or the movies, are Haitians who have died only to be raised from the grave and harnessed to plows which they pull forever after. Anyway, that’s the story.
I have been M.I.A. for a while for several reasons...
We thought today we would update everyone on Mom's search for a new service dog. When Mom adopted me and when Lola was dumped at our house, Mom had a lot more energy and her disease wasn't near as bad as it is today. Because of that, Mom isn't up to finding a good service dog candidate puppy and raising and training him/her so she decided to go the route of a program trained service dog.
Today I'm going to be a part of the long-running but still completely fun blog tour for Embrace by Jessica Shirvington! (You can read my review for it here.) And I just have to say that the main reason why this blog tour is still so much fun is because Jessica is a really sweet, genuine person. I hope you enjoy learning more about her as much as I did!
Don’t just run your finger through a phone book, look at designers portfolios, ask if they have ever done book design before, interview them. This is a two way street, you have to be comfortable working with the designer, he/she has to be comfortable working with you.
I'm very grateful for Hand-Work!
"This recommendation applies to any acquisition of ownership, and is not limited to particular kinds of change of ownership".Merpel's not happy about this highly principled and function-oriented approach. This is all very well, but it's not what the Patents Act says -- and who wants to rely on Banks at a time like this! I vote we seek leave to take this one to the House of Lords.
In any case, yeah. I have a really hard time breaking from my speaking patterns. It tends to translate into unrealistic dialogue, and that’s terrible. Sadly, the only way out that I know of is repeated reviewing, but as I said, that solution is far from perfect.
“Even I did with Sorlyna’s love.”
"Yeah, she could write your sequel," says Junior, heroine of the STAR CAPTAINS' DAUGHTER stories.
The pilot will be shot in the next few weeks. More information to come.
For the first time since he woke up, he recognizes his father standing not too far from him. His father grins at him and walk to him.
April: (sarcastically) "Love you, too, Caitlin."
Sway the drummers
22. Hair Bear Bunch
that we are not alone.
Where've I been lately? Away from the computer, that's where. Sorry there hasn't been any snarky industry commentary or any of my absolutely gripping beer reviews. I've just been preoccupied with other things, primarily working my fingers to the bone and relaxing with a beer or two at home most nights.
To take part in ‘Secret Soundtrack’ you will need a smart phone equipped with a QR Code reader and a pair of earphones. ‘Secret Soundtrack’ can be accessed from 1st June to 30th June 2012 by scanning the QR code on one of the posters located at ‘The Deptford Project’ café, ‘Bearspace’ gallery, art supplies store ‘Arch Materials’ or delicatessen cafe ‘Deli X’; all based on Deptford High Street and chosen as supporters of this neighbourhood and community arts.
Victim: Please don't bite me. Biting is not okay. It hurts.
Here are a few candid shots of the big day...
Dr Hotiarre:
Okay, I know I've been a little MIA around here - I promise, it's not because I don't love you - I DO!! I've looked at every comment and checked out every link from the {holiday sweet swap} and I am going to start doing some featuring - I swear! And I have so many ideas brewing and blooming in my head for crafty tutorials and delightful recipes to share with you!
125 x 125 square button provided by Sponsor.
B. combat experience for those who would lead the armies of both sides in the Civil War.
“Fury’s Seven” is a 2012 American comedy-superhero caper film. It features an ensemble cast of the world’s mightiest heroes. The film was a success at the box office and plans for numerical sequels, “Fury’s Twelve” and “Fury’s Fifty” are already in the works.
We don’t serve for awards that will hang on our wall or adorn our bookshelves. Other than an occasional mug from our kids saying, “World’s best mom,” we go through our everyday acts of ministry without recognition.
"I think we'd both better say five things we're thankful for. I kind of freaked out earlier," I said into the rear-view mirror.
Witches burning everywhere
St. Charles’s Church
You can add some toasted crushed nuts, too. Yum. This is a delicious way to get your daily intake of green veggies. I've tried it on steamed carrots, greens, and even grains like quinoa. It works, because it has that sweet/tart/salt balance.
I've never used foundation primer before so this is something cool to try! It's clear as you can see and when you rub it in, it's completely invisible and feels weightless.
In general, the way we survived this harsh cold weather in the past will be the way we will in the future – through adaptation. The plan researched the methods individuals use to survive the extreme cold weather in Fairbanks, Alaska; International Falls, Minnesota; and in Antarctica. It looked at the problems they faced and how they coped and adapted. This adaptation encompasses the clothes we wear, our transportation, the design of our homes and businesses, a greater understanding of cold weather health hazards and treatments. Little Ice Age conditions will strangle food production resulting in a series of famines. One section of the plan describes techniques individuals can apply in preparing long-term food storage. Massive ice storms and blizzards cause massive electrical outages. Many of the methods we currently use to heat our modern homes in the winter require electricity. Without electricity, homes in cold environments will slowly lose heat and become unlivable. Therefore, another focus in this plan is the need to have a back-up heat source that does not use electricity. At the governmental level, this plan discusses farming, energy, natural resources, plagues and excessive environmental regulations.
State: Still feeling the effects of overduing it at the BeerBistro and it's cold in July for me.
When it comes to changing diapers, there hasn’t been much advancement in the past century. Sure, we’ve gone from cloth to disposable diapers, an innovation that had moms the world over crying for joy, but beyond that, many parents have followed the same diaper-changing protocol for generations: remove soiled diaper, clean, apply lotion and sprinkle your little one – and everything around them – with baby powder. If only the process could be made easier and less messy. Coming this spring, Baby Magic® – a mom- and physician-approved brand for more than 100 years – will revolutionize the industry with the launch of Patty Cake®, the world’s first U.S. patented*, talc-free, dustless baby powder compact that will help give parents the magic touch at the changing table.
But what about the toothpaste ad that depicts a guy who manages to get a date with a hot chick after brushing his teeth with that brand of toothpaste? Technically, no claim is being made about the product's ability to enhance your attractiveness or sex appeal. Maybe the guy just had a complex about his halitosis, and thought (rightly or otherwise) that the paste would mask his breath long enough for him to ask her out.
When released during a December storm of Oscar contenders, "Invictus" will pull its audience from adventurous, older moviegoers. Even the presence of Matt Damon, along with Morgan Freeman, will bring in only a small number of younger people. But for those who do buy tickets, it will be a pleasure for them to encounter a movie that's actually about something.
The figures, released under Freedom of Information, have fuelled concerns over how Labour’s immigration policies have impacted on communities and services.
David gave us a picture of this when he said that our sin is cast as far as the east is from the west to describe how far they are removed from us (Psalm 103:12).
Afsan Chowdhury has a very interesting anecdote about why the Rakkhi Bahini didn’t move against Mushtaq after 15 August:
Friday's the day.
9. Create and nurture ‘the correct culture.’ – Watson, Sr had created the original culture of IBM but over the years, IBM personnel had moved away from the original ethos of that culture and had started to interpret it quite differently to how it was originally intended. LG made it an imperative to change the IBM culture that was a better reflection and fit for the changing times. The original culture hinged around:
This recipe has been linked up at:
This post is not deep and meaningful but it is deeply cute! This print is from Shirley who sells on ebay and I bought this absolutely AGES ago but only just got around to framing. I had to buy it as it's so lovely even though at the time I had no idea where it would go!!! So it's in my eldest daughter's room now above the bed and she thinks it's brilliant! Here it is in situ, I think it goes really well with the colours in there and is very cheerful and seaside-y. It's a bit higher than I would normally hang a picture but I don't really want the two little monkeys taking it down to put in a den or similar!!!
Here is the shape we want to make, before sewing it onto the corset. I have already covered it up with black electrical tape in this pic, but this should give a clear idea of what it should look like. You need to measure the across the small of your back for the bottom bar. That way you can be sure it won’t poke out the sides. It is helpful to hold the wings up to your back in the position you want them to hang at, and have someone else measure for you.
Charlotte
Should I come close or walk far away
The blank page:
Chest 38″ – 36″
Oh, Jack. Sometimes I can't help but wonder if having a spin-off has enhanced the character or sort of ruined him a bit. Jack works better as a more campy action hero than an intense, Doctor-like brooder at times and somewhere between the last two series of Torchwood, I think RTD lost sight of that. Still apart from a certain Time Lord, he's still one of the most unconventional leading male characters on a sci-fi/fantasy programme and that alone means he deserves to be on my list.
And this is the result. Really good for us, eh? Ah, but then it tried to pull a swifty, a “Look at me, I’m in for this” line. And THAT worked so well, didn’t it? Here’s the bottom line:
Poor devil! see him over his trash,
The journalists present at the meeting said Malema continued making the same anti-white hate speech statements and again incited his followers to sing the banned song “KILL THE BOER”.
Beg you baby, please
From now on...
40. The Dahlmanns-All Dahled Up (Pop Detective)
PunchBunch Medium Sky Flake and Sparkle for stamens
I’m prepared to go out on a limb
Enjoy these morsels, my lovers. This summer is gonna be all-time, let's start here. Where life exists.....the music.
...explained how much of a burden it is for parents to take care of an autistic child...
Pharoah Sanders: Saxophonist Pharoah Sanders was initially part of John Coltrane’s group before scoring his own hit with 1969’s “The Creator Has a Master Plan.” The saxophonist went on to become a world-class leader, waxing the East-meets-West-meets-Africa of these two great albums from 1973.
— Tim Burton
- True Blood will feature an upcoming flashback to Alcide and Debbie as children.
Then at 9:30 I make breakfast, sit down, and write (and eat). I write until noon (or longer if I’ve been bitten by Creativity Head Lice). Then I break for lunch until about 1 or 1:30. Then I workout for about 2 hours. Sorry, I know that makes some people jealous. (“Sure wish I had the time to work out…”)
Watching pretty dogs? Fabulous.
Mike Daisey, who has been talking about Jobs and Apple and the factories at Foxxcon, where the toys are made under armed guards and oppressive conditions. Underage workers and maimed employees. Daisey had met with workers and heard their stories and came back and told about his experiences and built a bridge between consumers and producers. He did interviews on his experiences. Op-ed pieces. And he got a lot of attention on This American Life, from WBEZ in Chicago, which excerpted parts of his Chinese sojourn for the show, then fact-checked him at the end of the program. They checked out the stuff they could, and found out that yes, there were accidents and yes, there were long hours and labor law violations and the like. Underage labor exists, though cases are not as common as Daisey indicated. The idea that the show checked out Daisey's statements, then presented what they found, strengthened Daisey's arguments. It was pretty impressive.
15In vain lost Eloisa weeps and prays,
"We have to value each other and not condemn each other," she responded.
My question for the Telegraph is this: which legal experts said that? Lots of lawyers have generously supplied the press with attributable quotes describing the effect of the judgement but I can’t find any that have said ’this decision gives the go-ahead to firms to get rid of employees at 65′. That’s not surprising, of course, because the decision does no such thing.
Every beam brings a dream, dear, of you,
My friend who is helping with this adventure often assists local classrooms when they incubate eggs. He sent me the following information regarding hatching eggs that he likes to share with the teachers. It’s a nice little summary of what is needed and why.
Viewing with: No One
Tober Moses Little Mans
1: an obscure speech or writing
Great time to stock up on Easter goodies too! No limits. Expires March 13th midnight!
NEW: Eat my tits – 1,2
I'd be happy to send you a copy of the complete manuscript, which comes in at a little over 85,000 words. Thank you for your time, and I look forward to hearing from you soon.
So to achieve your business’s goals, do what people do when they’re just sitting around: yack. Tell each other stories. Connect on a visceral level. And form relationships. That’s what social media is all about.
Of course, as the mom of two boys, I didn't have any tutus around the house. I stopped at Target and picked up two tutu, size 10 girls, the largest they had. It fit me like a garter, which is to say one leg per tutu.
As you read the 1Kings and 2Kings, you will see abomination upon abomination, from one descendant of Solomon to the next, with a few notable exceptions, that eventually tear the kingdom into two separate factions, which then eventually go into captivity, JUST LIKE GOD WARNED THEM…
Readers, feel free to send in your confirmed celebrity sightings! The more evidence you provide the better!!
So ends my ninth year of teaching. I hear the hum. This time it is my own humming. I'm humming zip-a-dee-do-dah. I thought I was supposed to whistle that one!
Life do not have to be mundane, you dont have to be rich to be happy and free. Define what happiness means to you and go in the way to lead a meaningful life!
Okay, back to wrestling. Kelly Kelly Vs Vickie Guerrero is taking place now.
Have you seen this cute bucket from Urban Outfitters?
THE FUTUREHEADS - Rant
.... the male cards!! November is a month for male birthdays in my family, nothing like adding that pressure to that of the upcoming Christmas season!! My husband is first, then his nephew, then a two-week gap before some more. Gah!!! Anyway, here's what I made for my husband this year:
Happier.
When I worked at the Odeon, everything was done right. I was trained properly. Showmanship and presentation really mattered. At first it was a frightening thought that I would be involved in presenting films to a maximum crowd of 2200 people, but surprisingly enough I gained confidence very quickly and moved up from trainee, who would 'float' between two shifts, to being assistant to Leonard Himsley, the second projectionist. The chief projectionist was George Gorham. Among the first films shown when I first started were Hitchcock's "Marnie" and Wilder's "Irma La Douce". We took a pride with presentation back then. We had 'carbon-arc' lamps for the screen light source. It was a sin if we showed the bare screen, or showed the film temporarily 'out-of-frame'. We had an 'act-drop', as it was called, instead of traditional curtains. These curtains floated to the top of the stage, although they could be opened the normal way which we did for live shows. There was 2,284 seats in all and they were often filled. It was a wonderful atmosphere. Audiences generally knew how to behave and they respected each other and as a result made a much more enjoyable cinema going experience.
Premium Membership Contest ($49.99 Value)
leaving the kites in the sky
We watched him slay
-Lightweight and does not make my face greasy
My papers are from MME’s “Lost & Found: Market Street”—I love the fun mix of patterns and soft colors. I used my Heart Nesties (yep I bought them a couple years ago..I tend to stay away from dies of shapes like this but I love the hearts and stars nesties) and then sponged the edges with ink to “shabby” it up. The border trim is done with a MS punch, pearls, a bow and sentiment from PTI.
I’ll write more about the details (where and when) of book signings tomorrow.
I suppose I cannot truly appreciate the position of a slave since I have been fortunate enough to have never been one. But our words certainly had the appropriate effect for the Egyptian stood aside and sank to the floor cowering in case his face invoked anger again for Argus.
I love quotes as much as I love top ten list.
Christian was wearing his trademark devilish smile, his tongue going under one his fangs and pausing there as he took her wrist and held it in his hand. “This isn’t the diamond bracelet I bought you.” Christian chuckled, sitting up in bed with Addison as he took the necklace off her wrist. He held it in front of his face as he studied it, Addison sitting up and planting her bare body on his lap, straddling his hips.
He smiled. “Fine.” He was not going to question it, though, just accept what was happening to him. This time, that was all he was going to allow himself – total acceptance… and the hope for more of the same…
I am so thankful for all the wonderful people in my children lives that help to teach them and help them grow.
“For a man with your past,” Ivanov went on, “this sudden revulsion against experimenting is rather naïve. Every year several million people are killed quite pointlessly by epidemics and other natural catastrophes. And we should shrink from sacrificing a few hundred thousand for the most promising experiment in history? Not to mention the legions of those who die of undernourishment and tuberculosis in coal and quicksilver mines, rice-fields and cotton plantations. No one takes any notice of them; nobody asks why or what for; but if here we shoot a few thousand objectively harmful people, the humanitarians all over the world foam at the mouth. Yes, we liquidated the parasitic part of the peasantry and let it die of starvation. It was a surgical operation which had to be done once and for all; but in the good old days before the Revolution just as many died in any dry year–only senselessly and pointlessly. The victims of the Yellow River floods in China amount sometimes to hundreds of thousands. Nature is generous in her senseless experiments on mankind. Why should mankind not have the right to experiment on itself?”
Stage two dealt with the sky and blocking in the mountains in the far background. This was a great learning point for me because the fast-drying Acrylics do not have such incredible blending characteristics! It was very enjoyable to apply the techniques described earlier in the book and to produces such wonderful results.
It is funny that the national alcohol of Brazil, cachaça, is close enough to the word, cacheta. Right? Cachaça, cacheta. Gin, gin. Rummy, rum. What’s the deal? Nothing goes better with cards than alcohol? Or vice versa?
Inspiration is everywhere, isn't it?
c) there was no wait (we would have had to wait until the 5:00 tour for Cameron Cave).
Yes, it is time for absorbing story. For a writer it is also a time for making stories. The enforced house arrest aids this also. So here I am, on the day we have our second Christmas –our grown-up children form London are coming a little later – working away. It is, of course, a pleasure. I did have a new computer for my birthday (22 December).
As a live musician you can control sub mixes of your virtual keyboard rig, activate setups and change parameters of the virtual instruments or even hardware instruments, all in realtime on stage.
And I
Clayton and I met via AOL Instant messenger back in 1999. We were friends for a good year before we became a couple back in early April 2000. We finally met in person in August 2001.
From the cover: For 650 years from the end of Roman rule to the Battle of Hastings the Anglo-Saxons controlled England; in religion, culture and administration their legacy is still with us today.
"I'm far from retired, simply because I can't afford it. All the money I made from the Marvels and had saved up went down the drain when, in 1960, I invested as junior partner in publishing Space World, a magazine about astronomics... I think it was a good job I did as editor-in-chief—although the public stayed away from it in droves...
Our first visit was on the first sermon of a marriage series titled "Crush". We were interested to see what it was all about and, once we heard the first marriage, excited to hear what else Jason had to say, because our marriage has overcome MOUNTAINS (in the plural) in the past 12 months.
My step-mother came out some time after that but I couldn’t remember what she did because the popping pain lights in my eyes became too much.
~Gryt
Alex Rodriguez - a Double Yankee Dipper! -2 pts
Anyone recognize this line from the Jetsons. But, the line really applies to the ITCZ - we have had enough fun, thank you very much. We survived the day of squalls all right, but last night was tougher. The winds kicked up between 20 and 30 knots, which is okay. But, the seas have been very very confused and we have been bouncing around all over the place, which meant neither one of us got much sleep. Oh well, we made good time - always the silver lining...
The wife came home from work, walked into the kitchen, and it did not take her long to spy the new wine rack perched on the counter-top. (Me standing with a huge grin, pointing like crazy at the rack, made it real easy)
“We asked our detectives to -review the British process to see if there’s anything that we can take away from it” Davis said. “I think this is a learning process for us right now.”
Just heard this momentarily misleading report on "All Things Considered":
So here they are folks:
Iridologists claim that by studying the patterns of a person’s iris, they can provide helpful and accurate health and wellness information.
In other words, we might trace what NYTimes-style discourse characterizes in terms of split between a serious (artistic, adult) and a frivolous (mass, juvenile) approach to cultural production. In the former category, keep an eye out for how often critics feel obliged to justify the play & whimsy that can sometimes creep into these works. 'Such-and-such isn't a genre film, but rather a meditation on genre.' 'The author simply uses genre tropes.' Characterizations like these may often be true. But it is the fact of the separation that intrigues me. Defenders make great claims about the likes of Harry Potter or Lost, sometimes quite extravagant claims - but rare is the recourse to realist or modernist justification. Nobody (or almost nobody) says that the oeuvres of Rowling, J.J. Abrams, the entire Batman franchise, or Joss Whedon are really something other than genre. Instead, the achievements of mass culture are surplus to genre, or built off it. In a sense, then, what serious culture performs, when it uses genre, is in fact a representation of it - a mimesis of or toward metaphor, if you will.
9. Tertiary education may not cost more than 10 times average wage. Medical education being a necessity and to cutr down costs of healing will be free. There must be sufficient educational facilities for all persons.
I love that we had the opportunity to focus and celebrate Christ's birth first thing, and then come back home for the gift exchanging.
I did find the clip online so you can see the interaction: http://www.dailymotion.com/video/xp6bpc_project-runway-all-stars-isaac-mizrahi-gets-in-trouble_shortfilms . It obviously cuts off before he finishes explaining himself, so maybe Joanna Coles took his comment too far, but something obviously must have irked her enough to put it in the magazine that she wanted to slug him for it.
Extraordinary bosses see business as a symbiosis where the most diverse firm is most likely to survive and thrive. They naturally create teams that adapt easily to new markets and can quickly form partnerships with other companies, customers … and even competitors.
Who knows what it’s going to take to really make current players wake up and realize what they are doing to their bodies. Sure, everyone knows going into an NFL-career that there are certain risks, but it’s the actions of someone like a Gregg Williams who takes that risk and amplifies it by offering cash for vicious hits.
The road follows Roaring Fork (hence the name) for much of the way, so we stopped quite often to take in the beauty of the stream. I was happy for the opportunity to try out my new variable density neutral filter, which allows me to use extremely slow shutter speeds. The exposures for the photos in this post were from 15 to 24 seconds.
I've just finished prepping next month's 'technique of the month' - zendoodling on bisque! Very relaxing I have to say and I can't wait to see this little piggy when he comes out of the kiln all bright and shiny :) For each technique I make a step by step photo guide so people can refer to it in the studio...
has donated this fabulous prize!
"I'm trying to get better," she keeps telling me, "The medication is nearly out of my bloodstream, we can go back to the way things used to be.
The weekend after that it's back to Miami for what I've been looking forward to since last April. The time when my inner rave child comes out to play. The time when nothing in the world matters except the music being made from surrounding turntables.The epitome of the pop culture revolution.
It’s absolutely devastating to be accused of the trait you most hate. I’m going to do my best to remain positive with the whole thing, though, and, if anything, work even harder for the second weekend of the show.
small, beautifully MOVING PARTS is a story that follows pregnant technophile Sarah Sparks (Anna Margaret Hollyman) as her uncertainties about motherhood trigger an impulsive road trip to the source of her anxiety: her mother living far away and off-the-grid.
This stout was very strong on the coffee flavor and the addition of the roasted chicory was a very nice touch. I do enjoy chicory brewed in my iced coffee and this very much reminds me of that. It pours a seriously dark chocolate color with a nice tan head. Smells were roasty, if that is even a word, and overwhelmingly like coffee (which is good in my book). The only thing that bothers me about this beer was the black licorice/anise. That is probably one of my least favorite flavors and when I get a taste of it, it takes over my taste buds.
Others said, “This is the Messiah.”
By request is this fine album related to my previous posts of Sparkling Sounds and Non Stop Pepsi Party.
Waiting for Spouse to get home to see if there's a way we can rig up a fix. Regardless, there's no guarantees that the other plastic pieces won't break as well. Aiiieeee!!!!
Me: Individuality. We could carry it through easily to all the sections.
When you are ready to cook, place a deep, heavy chefs pan on medium high heat and pour in 1 tbsp of oil.
“By night Reynolds, 37, revels in debauched threesomes with his wife and another woman, as pictures obtained by the People show.
8. Tell us what are you currently addicted to: My favorite embellishment are liquid pearls - I love how the add texture and dimension to a card. It seems these days that every project has to have just a little bit of liquid pearls.
The State selects a venue in one of the four provinces for the annual National Famine Commemoration, with Drogheda chosen this year and Sunday May 13 next the day on which the event will be held.
For me, the problem with these movies is that they have no sense of humor. A bit of comic relief would give the films color, would make the suspense more surprising by comparison and the revelations more shocking. Anyone who is familiar with color knows that this works. Yellow is brighter in the presence of purple, its direct opposite on the color wheel, than in the presence of any other color, and purple is more vibrant in the presence of yellow.
2. Café Itself
The romance novel follows, the researchers argue, a typical pattern. The hero is almost never, they say, a blue collar worker, a bureaucrat, or someone in the traditionally feminine occupations (hairdresser, kindergarten teacher, etc.). He is competent, confident, and usually wealthy. He is, in short, an alpha male.
One thing that has stood out to me throughout our study thus far is that Joshua wasn’t arrogant, he was confident. There’s a big difference. Arrogance is pride, but Joshua’s confidence came from faith.
and our belief in this leadership role for the kingdom to our cause, and in the framework of our desire to provide the duty of thanksgiving, and sought to coordinate and strengthen the bonds of cooperation, would like to convey to you our desire to make a visit to the Kingdom as soon as possible, especially since the bloody events taking place in Syria, and the challenges that lie in the region, accelerating steadily requires us all to move quickly to coordinate positions and activation efforts and consolidated according to the vision University of dealing with what we are experiencing and anticipate the next few days.
1 brow
After all, if you can be happy and laugh for just the sake of it, then you can do it when you want to. Anytime. You are not beholden to any sort of emotion or feeling. Mind over mind. That’s how I have been dealing with it for these many years.
Another is that with the size of this new universe, the ENTIRE known universe (ours in reality) would be repeated, meaning that the other you really could have the exact same history as you. You are made up of what you come from and what happens to you. If the universe is repeated, you are repeated.
“Luie, I’ve always worn a belt.”
Now move 1,163 miles East to Texas. The Ballpark at Arlington might be the best hitting ballpark in baseball. It's certainly right around the best. And since they built the Ballpark at Arlington in 1994, Texas Rangers players have won FIVE MVP awards. Yeah. Five. That's more than the Red Sox and Yankees combined over that time. I'll repeat that in case you missed it. Since 1994, the Texas Rangers have won more MVP awards than the Red Sox and Yankees combined.
Peel and slice the peaches. You should have approximately 8 cups. Pour the sugar on them and mix gently. Allow to sit at room temperature 2-3 hours. Place a colander over your preserving pan and pour the peaches and liquid into it. Let the juice drain for about 15 minutes. Put the peaches back in the bowl and set aside.
Finally, they got to the house where he was hiding.
Finally, and by far the worst imposition on the person foolish enough to lease a premises from them, they "tie" the pub to their own beer supplies, charging the lessor inflated prices for their stock and fining him/her if he/she buys elsewhere.
But can they operate a refinery?
Version 2: bring to the boil and then simmer until the meat mixture has rendered down nicely. You’ll want to cover the wok/saucepan or you’ll see some evaporation happening.
to match their humanity and its life
Since all writers exist in the present, all writing is unavoidably presentist. I would say that it is natural to use your current-day intellectual framework even when you write about the past. It would be dishonest not to. And it can be fun to enliven a historical text with sidelong glances at the modern. But I also believe the rules are different for fiction, nonfiction and memoir. At times I
If your daughter was not able to attend the field trip, contact Mrs. Sharpe to find out what she can do to earn her green patch. Keep in mind that you can visit the WMWD garden any time during regular business hours and read up on the information while you are there.
Christian Ethics in Business: Borrowing and Lending:
"While the `Day of Mourning' has served to focus attention on past injustice to the Native American cause, it has, in recent years, been orchestrated by a group calling themselves the United American Indians of New England. This group has tenuous ties to any of the local tribes, and is composed primarily of non-Indians. To date, they have refused several invitations to meet with the Wampanoag Indian tribal councils in Mashpee or in Gay Head. Once again, we, as Wampanoags, find our voices and concerns cast aside in the activities surrounding the Thanksgiving holiday in Plymouth, this time, ironically, by a group purporting to represent our interests."
TWC – The Word Connects: Connecting you to God and to one another …
Seventh round:
31 - The sooner you fall behind, the more time you'll have to catch up.
Schaafsma FG, Zweerman G. Zoeken en vinden van informatie over reproductie en arbeid. TBV 2006; 14: 414-418.
Runner Up: Dunno, don't buy beer from anyone else
#2: The Friday before Mother's day is known as Military Spouse Appreciation Day. While my husband is extremely thankful for the sacrifices that I make daily in support of his career choice, there is a day to honor those who, like me, have packed up and moved to other states and across oceans to foreign countries, to follow the service member of whom they love. I have done things that I can't imagine I would ever do in my lifetime. The life that I live on a daily basis is far from what I thought "normal" for me would entail. I don't toot my horn and brag, I don't say that I am stronger than someone else because I'm a military spouse. I am an Army wife, but it doesn't define who I am. I am just a girl, who happens to be married to a soldier, that lives in Europe. There are many activities that some posts do to honor us and I have never taken them up on it. Free spa days and such. I chose this life and I don't expect anyone to do anything special for a choice that I made. My husband honors and thanks me daily and that is enough.
Sometimes, yeah... pulling in two different directions at once. It makes tiny little tears in our fabric.
(Credits: Images and blurbs taken from Amazon and Goodreads.)
Finally, here's #19 in the challenge which is based on the vintage publication D.M.C. Tatting by Thse. Dillmont which you can download FREE HERE.
Over the years, Chung continued to enhance his act. In 1909, he toured Australia. In one trick, he threw dead animals into a boiling cauldron, from which they subseqnuently emerged alive. In an illusion called “The Birth of the Pearl”, he materialized an assistant from a large oyster shell. A trick he did in 1912 was called “The Dream of Wealth”. In it, heated milk turned into a shower of silver coins, then bank notes.
super excited about my secret opportunity that i'm scared to talk about just yet! the pessimist in me says "keep your mouth shut, or it will blow up in your face!" the optimist in me says "EFF YOU PESSIMIST, shout your news from the rooftop!" let's see who wins over the next few days lol
so perfect in design.
Pleasure without conscience,
(Much) more soon!
“We want to spread a message of hope, there is an alternative message to the racist message being put out by the far right groups in this country.”
(I quote Prince just to be different. Let's face it, the Twilight Zone quote most people would have used, "Submitted for your approval..." is such a cliche, although it is somewhat appropriate.)
and in so doing, brave soul, know that you have shattered
the stimulus package be immediately disclosed to the public and the elected
1:09 p.m. — Rehydrating yeast.
Really the phenomenon that is taking place here is I've become so acquainted with the city and the lifestyle and the language by now that the novelty of everything has kinda worn off. My discoveries are less daily and more profound. Regardless, I've had an eventful week and now will have to recount it in a ridiculously long entry that will make me regret ever letting laziness overtake my locquasiousness.
So, somehow this quiet little potter got sucked into the world of Arts activism bloggery. How this happened remains a bit of a mystery. But you might be surprised at how much of my days are spent not just making pots, thinking about pots, thinking about making pots, creating, thinking about creativity, trying to get a toe hold on reaching an audience for my work, analyzing why that seems so difficult, contemplating the overlapping connections between all these things, but also reacting to the overarching symptoms of an industry that sometimes seems to be struggling to make the case for its relevance. And I’m talking both niche fields like ceramics and pottery and also the wider game of the Arts in general.
Itâ€™s not enough that you love me for me
At Dusty Corners I made the first mistake of the day. I had Brian give me a Arizona Ice Tea Can...yes one of the big ones. I downed the whole thing at once. Needless to say the stomach wasn't too happy about 3 miles down the trail and my pace slowed greatly for a few miles as I regrouped mentally and physically.
“Thanks,” he said and nodded again. He wiped his forehead with an AutoZone towel and opened the gatorade to take a swig.
Care to guess which one provision totally pulls the rug out from under any patriot movement based on purely Constitutional principles? For additional credit, what other provisions support this view?
Perhaps I should defy the world
to someone she knew.
It's not the typical fall colors, but I wanted something without all the orange that I relate to Halloween. I am rather pleased with it and myself for reusing things I already had and for not breaking the bank.
The In-store was just off the back of their show at Lovebox Festival earlier that day. I’m sure that the full electronic performance at Lovebox was great, but what they did at Rough Trade on Brick Lane was just special. They had stripped back all the electronics and the five piece band had more maracas than you could shake a maraca at, simply wired keyboards and multiple vocalists achieving their lovely sound. Most of the tracks they played were of a lounge-jazz persuasion but it came out brilliantly. Obviously in a record store no one is going to be jumping around like mad so this laid back performance was perfect and it really eschued the talented musicians that Ernest Greene has assembled. They played a couple of tracks from the new album including Eyes be Closed and they also played some of their best from the first two albums; notably Feel It All Around and New Theory. Speaking to the bassist and the super-cool headdress-wearing keyboard player afterwards (who wanted to go riding around on Boris Bikes!) they said they thought that it went better than the performance at Lovebox. Really great, really special and you should have been there. Did I mention it was free?
When I find a patient has an elevated blood pressure reading in my office, my approach is to recommend the following to the patient:*
Mind you, I still don't do "resolutions". These are, to quote a pirate, "more what you'd call guidelines than actual rules."
In the end, if we continue expenditure at the same rate as before, all we end up with is a lot of debt and a shrinking economy unable to pay it off. A bit like the scenario we're already in, in fact.
The odd dink and mark here and there, but nothing like as many as we expected or had seen in the photos before buying, in fact, we both looked at each other in surprise and with a big smile on our faces at how clean it all was. What looked like rust was simply dirt from the journey and could easily be washed off!
By Alyssa
Arlene E. Fried, 49, Roslyn Heights, N.Y.
ps- Sorry for the weirdly sized images, I know it's a blogging faux-pas (I'm working on it)
As happens with so many trends, we believe this one has overshot the mark, and we plan to develop an infrastructure of small, agile, distributed manufacturing units, able to rapidly meet changing demands and provide mass customization that makes at least a beginning step in starting a new trend."
So while we mourn that Humanity is SO freaking screwed up, that we need someone to save us, and in order to save us, He had to voluntarily GIVE UP His own young life, we can rejoice that because Jesus died for us, and because He was and is God's Son, He knew no sin. No evil. He was taken back from the dead, and was taken to His Father's House, in Heaven. To forever be the SON of God, The Prince of Peace, The LORD of all lords, the King of all Kings,
Similar read: Divergent by Veronica Roth
Its their dreams to achieve.
Many blessings to you,
I just finished reading Limitless by Alan Glynn (which I just discovered was previously released under the name The Dark Fields). Great book, intriguing concept, definitely worth reading.
Up ahead, there's a curve in the road, and the killer rams into their vehicle. The impact sends the pickup sailing through the guardrail, and the truck comes to a stop after sailing a short distance. Natalie sees the janitor slumped over the steering wheel with blood on his face, so she rolls down her window and opens the outside handle to escape. She starts running again, as the rain picks up.
Despite all technology has brought.
Aguas Fresca ("fresh water") are non-alcoholic flavoured coolers which are great in hot weather. We tried the Tamarindo (RM8.50), made from tamarind fruit, sweet and sour in taste and rich in Vitamin B and calcium as well as Hibiscus (RM8.50), a cranberry flavoured drink made from dried hibiscus flower, and rich in Vitamin C and minerals. Out of the two, I prefer the Tamarindo. There are also other flavours such as Horchata, Limon and Mango. Cocktails are available for RM26 each.
Madsen divides his book into five sections covering encounters with people, urbanization, society, institutionalism, and self. The book’s main purpose is to provide real-life examples of missional activity. While most books with such a purpose become quickly dated, researchers studying the missional church will find this book a helpful record of early missional experiments, primarily in the United States but also internationally.
First time sitting up unassisted--you never did the whole tripod thing
A legend round the rodeo from Allaroon to Broome
Opposition does not have Japanese, Russians, Mongolians or any other as their party members. They are all citizens of this land, please do not forget Che Det.
Romans in Britain(1980) was prosecuted by Mary Whitehouse. Sitting through this state-financed attack on us was described as like someone spitting in your face! This was the aim of these Bourgoise-Marxists – Epater les bourgoise- to spit in the face of the bourgoise. These writers had no moral base as most of them had been to British public schools and had plummy middle-class accents and they were financed by taxpayers money..
(also few people still think im not in Japan)
Utterly unique; a flexible, sharply written, wide-ranging story that encompasses the life of a young Australian woman who comes to England.
"But if the cause be not good, the king himself hath
But since I want to get rid of corporate taxes I’m not too invested in that argument. So what else do I have…
(Now there’s a thought: I wonder just how many revolutionaries of ages gone by were actually blokes with gender issues: Lenin, Trotsky/ Surely not Stalin!)
Have you vetted what happens to some the contestants one of two years after the show?
Through twelve weeks of training, the class was whittled down to 85. The majority of the recycles came from land navigation. The rest were ones and twos for various things – history test, leadership evaluations, injuries, etc. OCS is not hard to pass, but it is easy to fail. My best advice for someone looking to go to OCS would be show up being able to score a 300 on the APFT, read as much as you can at the ArmyOCS Portal, and stay out of trouble.
Here is the links to these printables:
Confetti in chance flight
Sunday saw all the weekend’s three wins as Santiago Wanderers continued their good early season form with a 3-2 win over Rangers courtesy of 89th minute goal from Michael Silva. Following that newly promoted Antofagasta picked up their first win of the season with a 2-1 win over Universidad de Concepción and O’Higgins brought Unión Española’s recent run of good form to an end with a 2-0 defeat. The weekend’s final match saw Universidad Católica’s recent run of poor form continue as they shared the points with Unión San Felipe in a 1-1 draw. Both goals came in the last twenty with los cruzados‘ Michael Ríos opening the scoring in the 70th minute before Lihué Prichoda equalised for this visitors in the 86th minute.
duty is to his Caliph, and to keep the Princess
Purrkur Pillnikk Tribute Band @ Grand Rokk (Friday 17. October)
The most important exercise for a brand is to determine whether the dominant brand values are masculine or feminine. This determines the choice of colours or the colour palette for the brand. The colour wheel is divided into the cool/ masculine side and the warm/ feminine side.
hacked to paper
In the 1400's a law was set forth in England that a man was allowed to beat his wife with a stick no thicker than his thumb.
1 credit
Twisted Words
When we arrived, it was very cold inside! So, I went backstage and put my stuff in our dressing room and chit chatted with my friend, Angel.
Planning a wedding is time consuming but there’s no reason that it should take over your entire life. I do know girls who quit their jobs to plan their weddings and even dropped out of college – I’m sorry, took a semester off – to plan, and I think both are completely ridiculous things to do.
Dominique Ansel Bakery
Health
On the green side…color is vibrant..using a green, blue color scheme with warm flesh tones in the figure to give that side more life. We positioned the headline in the head scarf and the story in the dress of the figure. An extra embellishment was picking up the continents as a pattern in the scarf and dress.
Check out these 10 setbacks that Walt Disney had, some were financial nightmares that lost him millions of dollars:
17For the great day of his wrath is come; and who shall be able to stand?
Tuesday- crockpot vegetable soup (this recipe has the basic ingredients- I add a can of cream of mushroom soup and put it in the crockpot on low) and cornbread
a power-to-weight ratio of 9kg (19.8lb) per kilowatt. the rider can choose from among five cycling modes: human-powered only (’pure’), the electric motor alone (’egrip’), or pedaling supported by the electric motor (’pedelec’).
In the fall, I decided that I was going to run the 2012 BMO Vancouver Marathon, on May 6/12. I planned to run the Ginger Jar Half Marathon at the end of November, and the First Half Marathon in February, to build up my training base. The Ginger Jar Half went amazing, it was a perfect race, which I PR’d in 1:54:29, more than 8 minutes faster than any of the previous half’s I’ve run (about 8 over the last 6-7 yrs). December was a great training month of building/maintaining my base. January was a dreadful month for training, as I came down sick and was un-able to train properly for almost 3 weeks. I ran the First Half February 12th, and still had a terrible head cold. I still managed to finish in sub 2:00, in 1:58:16. It was a tough race, and took a lot out of me, but I was very proud of myself for a) making it to the start line and b) finishing my second sub 2:00 half marathon.
Should Zimmerman be charged with a hate crime?
abomination unto the LORD: and because of these abominations the LORD
Dear Lord, as my baby continues to grow, I pray that she will gain the right amount of weight, including the healthy amount of body fat. Help me to eat in a healthy way and exercise on a regular basis so I don't put my baby in jeopardy of having diabetes or other obesity-related health issues. Give me the strength to avoid junk foods and excessive sugar and fat.
I read the book in May and rated it 5 stars – it’s fairly standard Gibson fair, which is great; her celebrity hockey player/party guy hero has a lot to make up for, and it takes him a while, but he comes through. I was concerned about the narrator, Kathe Mazur, since two reviews had mentioned her voice: one called it gravelly, the other called it phone sex operator. She did sort of stage-whisper the narration, as though she was telling you a story but didn’t want anyone else to hear; not having any experience with actual phone sex operators, I’m not sure of the latter but I can see how it might be considered the former. I eventually stopped noticing it, though, and concentrated on the story. I actually think her narration made it a better story for me. She’s a good narrator, and I liked her various voices, even 5-year-old Conner. (However, every time she pronounced Ty Savage’s name as SA-vedge I cringed since Ty’s book made it absolutely clear it’s suh-VAHZHE.) Narration: also 5 stars.
Murdoch “turned a blind eye and exhibited willful blindness to what was going on in his companies and publications,” the House of Commons Culture Committee said in a report today that split lawmakers along party lines on critical findings. “This culture, we consider, permeated from the top throughout the organization and speaks volumes about the lack of effective corporate governance at News Corp.”
-Bell Hooks
I stood up and replied, “We’re washing your car.”
How long will the wicked, O LORD,
Add the Paneer and pickle and stir well.
This is a terrible idea on the industry's part. A LOT of us got into nursing because we thought, even though we HATED certain clinicals, it didnt matter because we wouldn't WORK in those specialties. I, for example get insanely bored in areas that don't move quickly. If i worked in a nursing home I'd probably go crazy within a week.
-1.00 RR WYB 2
We head onto the plane and guess who was in our row!! Oh yeah and she watched me like a hawk to make sure I was doing everything right.
On the other hand, York Castle Museum is hands down the weirdest museum I have ever visited and any traveler who enjoys euros in their pockets should stay far away.
Tactile learning is the most random, underrepresented, and un-accomodated type too–of course. I only wish I had known this when I took a billion chemistry credits (stupid reagents) or for animal nutrition (a class I should have done way better in, because I am very interested in the subject matter).
So annoyed at my mum. And I don’t even really know why. Just the usual button pressing has been turned up to 5 million.
After studying old photos, I now know the tight perm and oversized glasses I wore in the eighties were not, in retrospect, such a good idea after all.
i have a theory: if you wrap something in aluminum foil, it won’t burn in the oven. it won’t have the black charred marks. it won’t be cold inside while the outer crust is burned. so i wrapped the baguette in a foil. sealed! and into the oven it went. i wanted it to be nice and warm when i served it, so i think i left it in the toaster oven for more than 10 minutes. then i took out all the spreads we had in our refrigerator, including the butter and cheese. this is like hotel breakfast at your own home. =) on the side, some lean bacon. i discovered Purefoods Lean and Mean bacon, and i am hooked! such little fat, yet crunchy! we love it!
we will be sure to keep you in the loop in regards to a possible pregnancy and a baby.
6. Laura Palmer's Prom - You Say Party
Imagine being told by a car salesman that the car he wants you to buy is a fine car, but you mustn’t drive it faster than 20 mph because its breaks would fail. AND it’s also liable to roll over if driven without a passenger in the front seat. Why? Because the manufacturers design their cars that way!
Put it all together and you have a crazy rainbow cake that your four-year-old will adore!
Strong as I should be
Before I get all choked up, here’s some good reading for the weekend:
We tried to make it work with phone calls and airplane rides, but neither of us was mentally plugged in. If we were, the physical distance wouldn’t have been a problem; after all, it was only (supposed to be) temporary. The months wore on. Eventually my bitterness came out in every word and intonation. He wore his frustration like a coat. And he needed one. We were in a cold war.
Of course, I have nothing against these wonderful books and authors, and indeed, with a first book called When I was Joe and a preference for writing boy characters, I’d look very foolish to begin to complain about a possible bias towards boy books. I do suspect though that part of the reason why 'boy' books do well, is that girl readers are happier to read a book about a boy than boys are to pick up anything with the pink and sparkly covers that marketing types love so much. All the more reason for an award that celebrates books for and about girls.
It is meant to foster a community spirit between EU countries, which it probably achieves in a clumsy way, kinda. However, it is generally regarded as a bit of a joke, as the participants are often not hugely talented and the quality of the songs is often poor. About the only time that the winners of the competition went on to fame and fortune was back in 1974 when ABBA won. Hence the fact that most people in Europe on reading this story will have to suppress an initial snigger and mutter, “Aw, c’mon, they’re not that bad!”.
I love this final paragraph. I have not come across this material before and it feels important to me. Perhaps I returned to Vancouver after my soul fragmentation experience in February as I had not fully completed – or given thanks – for my sojourn in Canada? Although I am aware that Gaia is a living entity, I haven’t always acknowledged just how tough the going can be in this nebulous, light, oh-so-how-hard to-ground energy of Vancouver. I will give a prayer of thanks and gratitude for all I have learnt and received in Vancouver and report back within the next week or so.
But now, three-quarters of a century later, we are no longer talking about theoretical alternatives to corporate rule. We are talking with practical urgency about an obvious need. Now the two great aims of industrialism—replacement of people by technology and concentration of wealth into the hands of a small plutocracy—seem close to fulfillment. At the same time the failures of industrialism have become too great and too dangerous to deny. Corporate industrialism itself has exposed the falsehood that it ever was inevitable or that it ever has given precedence to the common good. It has failed to sustain the health and stability of human society. Among its characteristic signs are destroyed communities, neighborhoods, families, small businesses, and small farms. It has failed just as conspicuously and more dangerously to conserve the wealth and health of nature. No amount of fiddling with capitalism to regulate and humanize it, no pointless rhetoric on the virtues of capitalism or socialism, no billions or trillions spent on “defense” of the “American dream,” can for long disguise this failure. The evidences of it are everywhere: eroded, wasted, or degraded soils; damaged or destroyed ecosystems; extinction of species; whole landscapes defaced, gouged, flooded, or blown up; pollution of the whole atmosphere and of the water cycle; “dead zones” in the coastal waters; thoughtless squandering of fossil fuels and fossil waters, of mineable minerals and ores; natural health and beauty replaced by a heartless and sickening ugliness. Perhaps its greatest success is an astounding increase in the destructiveness, and therefore the profitability, of war.
11. Do you have stability balls in your school?
Morello: Okay. We’re going to talk about the new game mode, Supremacy. Is everyone here?
SPOILERS AHEAD
Make a glaze by mixing together the ground almond with the icing sugar and the egg whites.
Perez-Gonzalez intended to burglarize the residence when no one was there, authorities said.
As it clearly states on the menu, ($55 each, 10% of which gets donated to Blanchett House) it is designed so that everyone at the table gets one menu. The value perception on the Eat The Whole Menu has been so positive that most of the people who get it the first time return to eat it again. . . except that they want to split the menu amongst 2 or more people when they return. This is a fair request and we like to try to do everything we can to accomodate our guests. Unfortunately, accomodating this request can sometimes cause undo problems.
On the other hand, at Borders Costa Mesa we strolled in and immediately found four copies sitting on the shelf in Mystery, flanked by David Morrell and John Mortimer (and one of those damned "Cat Who Did Something Or Another" books. A Cat Who Cookbook, if you please).
We followed an inductive procedure in summarizing each of the 79 articles. Thus, the elements/factors we used to describe each article were modified as we progressed in our analysis. We did not anticipate how long the process was going to take. The length of time was also impacted by the fact that Shaul was in Israel and Ithaca, NY, Maria was in Athens, Greece, and Achilles was in Auburn, AL. We worked on analyzing the articles and writing the manuscript over a period of 4 years and exchanged 1600 emails. Of course, without the internet we could not have completed the research.
Once in my new lab, when discussing Caltech, I said that to admit more women, they'd have to lower their standards. This is unquestionably true, just as if they wanted to admit more men, or baseball players, or saxophonists, they'd also have to lower their standards in every other category. Being unquestionably true is not sufficient to keep people from getting upset about it, I've found.
Police said three armed men had entered the station’s community service centre at 10.30pm and demanded guns from two policemen on duty.
“God, I know you’re there. You’ve said so. You’ll never leave me, nor forsake me. I don’t know how I can make it, continuing like this… I know, people might think I’m foolish, or people might try to correct me, or rebuke me, or try to fix my broken pieces… well, I don’t want to feel this way at all, yet going against it just seemed harder.
because, my mother, unfortunately doesnt accept me.
Be mine without losing yourself or diminishing...
*Thank the person who gave you this award. Thank you boomie, you’re like a sis to me
3 parts Applejack
“He promised that we are all in this together – but he has cut taxes for millionaires while making millions of families pay more and at the same time he is making it harder for people to give big donations to charity.
I know that the subconscious mind and higher mind know what’s been going on with that elbow. I just need to bring it to my conscience mind—thus, divination!
Thank you and happy shopping!
This week on Life Full Circle Radio, we will look at the price of fame. Unfortunately, Whitney Houston was not the first or the last public figure to succumb to the pressures of fame and turn to substances to ease the pain. There are many stories of artists like Rick James, Curt Cobain, Luther Vandross, Tupac, Notorious B.I.G, Michael Jackson, Whitney Houston and many more that chronicle the lives of stars that shined bright and died at early ages.
Always, always check the inside of washers and dryers before using them. You never know what someone might have left in there.
With the Pantone colour of the year being Tangerine Tango, orange hued everything is, well, everywhere. While I already have a bunch of these lip butters, I couldn't help getting Tutti Frutti as well. It's a great introduction to the orange craze as it can be worn sheer or layered for more of a pop. The tone is also really wearable as it isn't too bright.
-Elisa D.
Surely, the group enquired, values are fundamental? Updating them may be one thing, but total change?
It occurs suddenly, lasts a few minutes to a few hours, and is a strong warning sign of an impending stroke. Ischemia can also affect intestines, legs, feet, and kidneys. Pain, malfunctions, and damage in those areas may result.
I’m addressing the subject briefly; these talks will go into depth.
Nora is working on a label design, and has big ideas for soap, candy, t-shirts, etc. I'll let you know when the full catalog is available. Of course, we won't be harvesting any honey for the first year, so plans are definitely still on the drawing board.
We are still so very selfish
Fast-forward to this season, and what you have is a GM who somehow supplied this team with more depth on the Line than we all realized. Will Beatty, drafted by Reese and Kevin Boothe, imported from Oakland have stepped in and contributed mightily filling in for the Big Blue regulars. No more proof of their effectiveness is needed than the holes they've created that Brandon Jacobs has run through these last two weeks and the fact Eli has stayed very well protected and clean.
With the coming of railways improved transportation diminished the importance of Weyhill fair and increased competition made it harder for Farnham hop growers. Their premium price became eroded, which made it more difficult to recover after bad years as their land rent and other costs were higher.
Pepper, a dash or more
Appearance: Golden in color.
4. I have lost my reading and writing mojo and am fighting to get them back. By this time last year I'd read 30 - 40 books and this blog had seen a lot more action. Why have they gone? Is it the busyness of motherhood? of life? of being my own boss? partly. Is it the easy satisfaction and interactivity of twitter? I don't know. Since I learnt to read I've been an avid reader. It's weird that this whole year I've finished only one book. I'm now reading Shantaram at The Band's insistence. Hopefully that will kick start my reading again.
Joy :)
The other reason I like the story is that it aims to the core of what I feel writing is about. It shows rather than tells, it asks the reader to make their own decisions and to provide their own input, and it concerns the importance of words in our lives. The story tells, in only around 300 words, the story of a life through the important words uttered by a man over the course of that life. What is key for me is that these are not large, long, important words, but the simple building blocks of everyday transaction and communication which, in context, can change everything.
But enough of whining about my problems.
We think we're going to barf right about ... now.
One thing I really love is the fruits we get during this season. Strawberries, pears, mangoes, bananas, apples, chickoos, grapes and so many more. Strawberries come from cooler places like Mahabaleshwar, a hill station close to Mumbai, grapes come from neighbouring Nashik and mangoes from different regions of Maharashtra. Spring fruits come to us all the way from Himachal and Kashmir but remain fresh thanks to better storage facilities. All this variety is thanks to the Sub-continent's tropical climate and geographical location.
With only two months of notice, I worked on this night and day so I would be sure to finish in time. It actually only took two weeks of non-stop knitting and beading. I think I lost about fifty beads in my couch.
As for me, I think I’m going to play the field for a while and get to know a few of the dogs on my street before committing to another dog myself. I’ll see if I can’t make friends with the new puppy next door and dog-sit once in a while. After all, it’s nice when they visit, but it can be just as nice when they go home!
On the way home, we picked up supplies at Farmer's Market and did some window shopping in Union Square. Margaret came over soon after we returned. Pizza delivery for dinner along with a good bottle of wine. She and I played Lego Batman on Xbox for an embarrassingly long time - we have absolutely no skills at the game, but it is so fun!
Cigarette Tax
Wow. Talk about respectful and sincere! Mind boggling, isn't it? There were several more "clarifications" in the same vein. Again, she is stretching to make the 'Mrs. Moneybags' argument and fails spectacularly. She apparently didn't realize that her statement sounds a lot more like sour grapes than reaching out a hand of reconciliation. She has since offered a more traditional apology - via public statement. I guess there's no phone call for Ann, either.
We swung in our airy flights.,
and just for fun:
The video is an extract from a set of talks on prayer, given by Llewellyn Vaughan-Lee June 2011, Omega Institute.
Then...I have to sleep alone and I'm a baby.
3:00 - bottle
The awkward lines only get worse during the final fight. Am I to assume that having your abilities sucked out of you results in you spewing out horrible food-related comebacks? Because that’s the only feasible reason I can come up with for Megan’s lines near the end of the episode.
As I scrolled through the titles I spotted one with a cover that looks almost exactly the same as the one I was working on a few days ago. I did a double take, then looked at what the reviewer was saying about it. The irony! The comments were mainly about the astonishing professionalism and attractiveness of the cover.
The tall center back has been at the club since 2008 after signing from a Spanish outfit called Cornelia.
Senator Cunningham is already sold on this bill and she doesn’t want a long or complex hearing, so we can save a mass rally for later, but right now about 1000 witness forms is just what is needed.
No matter who she is, chances are she pumps her own gas.
Astronomical calculations of stellar influences upon a living being are not suppositions, but are factual, as confirmed in Śrīmad-Bhāgavatam. Every living being is controlled by the laws of nature at every minute, just as a citizen is controlled by the influence of the state. The state laws are grossly observed, but the laws of material nature, being subtle to our gross understanding, cannot be experienced grossly. As stated in the Bhagavad-gītā (3.9), every action of life produces another reaction, which is binding upon us, and only those who are acting on behalf of Yajña (Viṣṇu) are not bound by reactions. Our actions are judged by the higher authorities, the agents of the Lord, and thus we are awarded bodies according to our activities. The law of nature is so subtle that every part of our body is influenced by the respective stars, and a living being obtains his working body to fulfill his terms of imprisonment by the manipulation of such astronomical influence. A man’s destiny is therefore ascertained by the birthtime constellation of stars, and a factual horoscope is made by a learned astrologer. It is a great science, and misuse of a science does not make it useless. Mahārāja Parīkṣit or even the Personality of Godhead appear in certain constellations of good stars, and thus the influence is exerted upon the body thus born at an auspicious moment.
The people responsible for this did not go away when Communism fell, the aim of overthrowing the West and replacing it with a soviet style utopia was no longer an option, but that did not change the aim of overthrowing the West. Indeed, as the years had past a new more anarchistic breed had joined the old Stalinist, for whom the destruction of the West was more important than any subsequent reconstruction.
Hubby: Um... On second thought, maybe someone needs to stay home, and by "home" I mean "In touch with reality".
Market pulse stock advisory, best intraday tips provider online, gives you free premarket advice on Indian stock market daily. Good predictions on intraday market help short-term investors make money with smart investment in intraday Nifty or shares by referring our guide on Nse India today. Get latest information on Nifty trend, buzzing stocks on technical charts, Nifty and stocks futures options suggestions, intraday buy recommendations, Bse stock screener, jackpot Nifty calls puts and live intraday India market watch at one place
So, not a whole lot by way of amazing discoveries there. I think perhaps the choice of beer had a lot to do with that so, as a bonus round, I decided to throw in something strong and dark to find out what happens, so I grabbed a bottle of Brooklyn Black Chocolate Stout from the stash.
Alô querida família!
*Joseph graduated from dental school in May 2011. I am still amazed at him and what he sacrificed for our family and that we actually made it through.
I really thought I’d have a lot to write about here concerning structure, but I don’t. Obviously, the internal structure is different. The two protagonists meet but are already in love by the beginning. The impediment really isn’t an impediment of the usual sort (a rival) – it’s a style that’s the impediment and that’s easily overcome. And then we do end happily ever after.
and said "Dude...she has seriously stepped it up! When I
- Grimaldi's (1 Front Street): Grade Pending, 30 violation points.
I was sad to finish this book, because I wanted more! But, guess what! He has a sequel and the name of it is The Glass of Time, which I am now devouring.
The Regent’s Daughter (Une Fille du régent, 1845)
Designed to tempt every palate, this collection of far-ranging stories seems to include something for everyone-and no one story can accurately indicate the tone or appeal of the others. A skim through Lady Churchill’s Rosebud Wristlet is rather like flipping through the stations on a radio: you’ll find everything from pop music to health advice, and one of those stations is bound to interest you. The main difference is that where one might feel silly for finding a commercial more engrossing than anything else on the radio, this book’s offerings embrace so much, in such a short span of pages, their readers will be too busy paying attention to compare them to anything else.
His body language was below board. Literally below the board of the table…by about six inches, where he held his cell phone. The text came in, he stiffened and his body actually turned away from her and toward his cell phone. Whatever was on that text he was not inviting his date to be a part of by ‘hiding’ the cell phone under the table and disengaging his body from the moment.
After arriving, the first thing they did was visit Okinawa’s longest beach, which boasts a length of 700 meters. On sunny days, you can enjoy various sports or a stroll in the beachside parks, but unfortunately, the day we visited was nothing but rain and strong winds. It was awful: the lounge chairs that had been set out by the beachside were soaked; the umbrellas were beaten and battered by the wind; and everybody got completely drenched.
My mother is serving up plates of her home-made rhubarb tart. I smell it and remember our garden and the rhubarb that she once grew. I remember her rolling the pastry and warming the oven. I recall the welcoming and homely smell as I threw down my school satchel and pulled off my tie.
I am not a fan of headless covers, but the darkness before him and the tattoo just makes it hot
Anna Mackowiak is the jilted dentist facing jail time, after extracting all of her ex-boyfriends chompers. The teeth got plucked just days after the dentist got dumped by Marek Olszewski, who then went back to see his ex-lover because of a toothache.
I normally use watercress to cook soup. I have added some Chinese Red dates (ang cho) which is good in improving Chi. For some additional sweetness, I also put in some dried longan which is effective in warming up our body! Check out this clear watercress soup with longan and Chinese red dates (ang cho) recipe.
seek it out and you shall learn
HOW CONVENIENT.
1/4 teaspoon black pepper
Mat 14:36 They brought to Him all who were sick, and begged Him that they might only touch the hem of His garment. And as many as touched it were made perfectly whole.
The recent construction of Healthy Home 2010 by Dior Builders in Palatine, Illinois is a culmination of over 16 years of scientific research and the collaboration of experts in a variety of areas to build a “Healthy Home” as a tangible means of educating the public about keeping families safe from environmental toxins. We spend at least 90% of our lives inside a home or building, so the quality of the environment can be essential to our good health.
The Call:
New York Jets: For his first two years in the league quarterback Mark Sanchez was dubbed “The Sanchise”. The Jets made the AFC Championship game in each of his first two years. Now after an 8-8 season they are ready to throw him into the scrap heap. The Jets were in turmoil at the end of last season and even though Sanchez may have been the least of their worries we all know that head coach Rex Ryan loves attention and would love to bring in Peyton Manning to make fans forget about the locker room woes on 2011. Their receiving corp has malcontent Santonio Holmes and they have Shonn Greene coming out of the backfield. Dustin Keller is a weapon at tight end that Manning would love to utilize. The Jets have one of the top defenses in the league. Obviously the big story about Peyton playing for the Jets would be that he was playing in the same city as his brother. We’ll hear the jokes about Archie and Olivia Manning’s reduced travel schedule or the Manning duplex but I think this might be more of a deterrent than an advantage. Eli has built himself into an icon of New York City after spending much of his career in Peyton’s shadow and I’m not sure Peyton is ready to step back into his spotlight. Also it needs to be acknowledged that the turmoil and the in-fighting in the Jets clubhouse was very real at the end of last season and Peyton would probably need assurances that it’s in the past. The problem with that is that public enemy #1, Santonio Holmes, is virtually unmovable and Rex Ryan has too much pride to change his coaching style for one player. Still they will go all out if they really want him and they will probably be one of the better teams to make a run at Peyton.
"Here. On Earth."
Below is a picture of the dead
The sources that disclosed the possible presence of arsenic said that finding the poison does not mean the death was a homicide, because it could have accidentally entered his system.
The choice of Our Lady in her Immaculate Conception as Patroness of the United States was approved by Pope Pius IX in an audience on Feb. 7, 1847; and this approval was announced in a decree of Propaganda dated July 2, the same year. Both of these decrees of Propaganda have the signature of Cardinal Fransoni.
Seis: Six is my favorite number and lucky too.
Quick, think – what else do we have? Beans? Yes. Oh no wait – I’m not even sure we’ve got beans…. shit, did I use the last tin on Wednesday? Oh, hell. Potato waffles? But what’s the point of waffles if we’ve got nothing to put on them? Oh, God, have we even got MILK???? One of us will have to go to the garage, but what if it’s raining? What if it is raining. I hate rain. I wish it would stop raining. My life is being ruined by the rain, my vitamin D levels are dangerously low, I seriously think I’m developing seasonal affective disorder….
Here are a few pictures from my pinterest board of my favourites.
“If you ask any developmental psychologist in Sweden who is into this question, they would say, ‘You know, it has a likely connection to the fact that 93 percent of all 18 month to 5-year-olds are in daycare, often for many hours a day,” he continued.
Carry on!
Roger remained silent on his knees; the only flicker of emotion was a slight twitch under his right eye that flickered like the wings of a hummingbird.
If my memory serves me right, all the labor forces in Kansas City volunteered material and hours to build this magnificent fountain. My Steve did the final plumbing on this fountain and he holds it very dear to his heart.
This romance ebook synopsis, is presented by Laura Meets Jeffrey, a to be released romance ebook featuring the love and romance exploits of Laura and Jeffrey during the ’1970s and early ’1980s. Laura Meets Jeffrey . The new romantic adult ebook is told from both sides of the relationship, having first point of views from both Laura and Jeffrey. Great piece of romantic literary work that is sure to be very engaging while revealing much about the state of adult romance during the early ’80s!
It appears that Casey was staying with a boyfriend at the time her daughter went missing. After locating the car and returning it to their home, Cindy Anthony searched it and found a purse with information on a friend of Casey’s. Cindy asked the friend to take her to Casey’s boyfriend’s house. She confronted her daughter and demanded to see Caylee. They drove around for a while, then Casey finally admitted that she didn’t know where her daughter was. Returning to the Anthony family home, Cindy finally called police. Casey spoke to the 9-1-1 operator as well, and calmly told them that her daughter had been missing for four weeks, but she was afraid that her abilities as a mother would be questioned by authorities, and that is why she did not report the disappearance.
I have family and extended family that lives from Tokyo down to Osaka where my son and his family lives.
I'm going to take a bath now and the after that, have some Shocu drink with watching DVD again...
It was harder on me than it was for Mom. It's kind of like dropping your kid off for her first day of kindergarten...but not. I didn't know how it was going to go, and you know...it's still a nursing home, with nursing home sights and nursing home smells, and nursing home nurses, and it's intimidating on your first day.
Meanwhile, Bombardier’s Learjet 85 — the largest aircraft to bear that famous marque, and the first constructed of composites rather than aluminum — should begin flight testing this year.
Oh, the hashtag. Such a simple concept that holds so much power. Just by using the pound sign (#) attached to a keyword, you can easily categorize all of your Instagram photos. But why? Some may say because it helps other users find photos with subjects of their interest, but the true reason to hashtag your photos is to gain more followers. Trust me, I know this from first hand experience. Users interested in certain keywords will see your posts and think, “Hey, that person loves her puggle. I love my puggle too. We should connect.”
Stone of Scone Scotch: (**) Really light for a scotch; sweet, yet still has that sharp alcohol burn (but still, very light); little aroma; nothing special.
Dieter Derek
Overall a great beer, and better than the Dupont in this reviewer's opinion. And while I certainly recommend this beer, for a price accessible saison more as a session beer, try Ommegang's Hennepin, a great representation of what American brewers can achieve through patience and skill.
Excellent digital radio broadcast capturing Blur playing fifth on the bill on the Sunday on the NME Stage. The band's third album "Parklife" had been released two months earlier and five of these songs are from that album.
Gaia knows what is happening to you. She realizes that several very significant events are close and that these will transform your global societies. We understand that it is natural for many of you to seek comfort in your religious traditions, and we wish to acquaint you with many things that will enable you to see that these traditions are only a start toward a fuller understanding of what is occurring. You are on the brink of a vast abundance, and your psyche is to be freed from its old limited-conscious ways, bringing you to an expanded view of how your world works. This clash of perspectives is something we are fully prepared to reconcile. Your Ascended Masters learned, during their long journey toward immortality, ways to effectively introduce you to a new and broader outlook, and this is to be their prime contribution to our first contact mission. It is time for you to move from a limited to a fully conscious view of Creation and physicality, and it is logical to learn from those who acquired wisdom from the Earth school, as you are doing.
In the picture above, the windshield wipers are up which is a code to let all know that this car is being washed / has been washed.
1 word
Having grown up in the United States, I had never experienced ‘lecturing’ or ‘copy exactly what I say from my notes (chalk and talk)’ until I was a Peace Corps Volunteer in Namibia. When I was first exposed to this concept of memorization and lack of thinking/reasoning, not only was I chagrined, I was absolutely aware of the unlimited amount of control one can have by not educating a population of people for 10 years. If what you say is the end all of information, who would ever be bold enough to question you…..and if others are given a set stricture of what to know, who would possibly think there was anything more to know, especially where few books exist.
My planting of 'Toughball' onions have had canes and clips added to them in an effort to keep them growing nice and straight They've suffered a bit in the strong winds of the past week, but no lasting damage has been done, and the canes should ensure they keep growing well.
Occasionally, the world seems to crash down around you. Other times it seems to put itself on your shoulders like an ugly sweater made of lead. And sometimes the world just keeping poking you until you yelp out in pain, then it keeps poking.
And the girl who delivered the speech about not becoming monsters like them and being humane needs just 5 minutes to completely change her mind and go stabbing one of them like he’s Janet Leigh.
2. Alice In my spare time I'm reading Alice in wonderland again, things do seem VERY contrary around here.
The idea that everyone on the Internet will become illiterate due to acronyms not only verges on absurdity, but I would even suggest that these acronyms have the opposite effect. Chat-speak helps people send and receive information faster, and in the world we live in, fast is what matters most. (In other words, “ASAP” — which was first used by the U.S. military in the 1950s.)
My next post was suppose to be about our front porch update but after losing my post that I had nearly completed, I’m going to take a break on the porch updating (while I cool off from being ticked at Blogger) and write about my thrifty finds this weekend (on Word).
4. Fine Time (Silk Mix)
Alabama Pitts - Sing Sing
Are the different bodies necessary? I think if they just put the dress on the man’s body, and angled his arms out, he could pass as a woman.
Actually it's real nice under the sun. I kept saying I don't want a real dark color and she insisted that the dark would be temporary only. After wash about three times it'll become light and lighter again. And she is right!! My hair now become lighter after a few washes.
An excellent way to play the music you like at an inexpensive price. You can either hook your IPOD to the unit or a memory stick that you have placed music or a book on and play it through your vehicles speakers.
6. Now add the stuffed brinjals slowly in the pan and mix them until the brinjals are well coated with the onion mixture. If there's some leftover paste, add it now on the eggplants. Simmer the heat and cover for 5 - 10 mins.
The government and the High Court do not recognize the legality of the sale.
Testing.
Now, some of you know all ready how I spend hours seaching for myself on the web. Yes, I do! And I have mentioned that I have set up Google Alerts for my name so if anyone writes about me I get sent an email with the link so I can go check it out.
Science fiction meets science fact.
You get the idea.
The novel focuses, mainly, on a New England all-male prep school in the 60's. The school, which is nearly all white and is all male, is struggling with issues of race and socioeconomic status and the headmaster is trying to decide if the school should go coed when the first female is accidentally admitted (her name is Carole, a name that the secretary mistakenly thinks is male). Not only is Carole female, but she is black and from the lower middle class, so she makes everyone uncomfortable.
"Celebrate Halloween!"
Now I'm sure
Luke 2:34-35 – The Bible (KJV) – And Simeon blessed them, and said unto Mary his mother, Behold, this child is set for the fall and rising again of many in Israel; and for a sign which shall be spoken against; (Yea, a sword shall pierce through thy own soul also,) that the thoughts of many hearts may be revealed.
“Managed to get some infos on the plans for tomorrow (although absolutely illegal!)”
Protect your phone with award-winning security & antivirus from Lookout
There is something of a distinction to be made here between fiction and non-fiction writing, especially for children. It's easy for the publisher to think to themselves, 'Ah, she likes writing these stories, so she will want to do them anyway. Getting some money is a bonus.' (Crap, by the way - you want it, you pay for it.) They are less likely to think someone might spend their leisure time writing trade books about earthquakes, or fast cars, or textbooks about bacteria. But publishers still don't necessarily pay properly for these, especially the text book. After all, some text books are written by teachers, aren't they? And teachers have a day job so they don't need much money. Crap again - you want their time, you pay for it.
And a few times I was knock knock knockin' on Heaven's door (or purgatory).
Fashanu praised Ibori for overseeing the construction in Delta State of three Olympic and FIFA-registered stadia, an 18-hole golf course and a shooting range.
You will also notice several smaller round and irregular shaped white polymerized protein pools surrounding the large white protein pool. This pattern is indicative of a congestive bowel, bowel irritation and inflammation and a pre-cancerous or cancer colon.
This will be the first time most of the boy bands are performing in Singapore, besides SHINee, who were here last September. Hip-hop artiste Jay Park appeared on Singapore’s television screens last Sunday as a guest performer at the Star Awards 2012.
Cataclysm cleared the mist and continent discovered by refugees from nearby Alliance vs. Horde naval battle.
Clear?
Anyways, today was LSAT day all around the world. The test started at 830 a.m and I had to be at the center at 7:30 am in London. I was up so early, like 6...I know for many that might be reasonable - but no not me. I couldn't fall asleep until 2ish.
The Professional package is priced at £699 and authors may use their own images or library stock art at no extra charge. All the standard services described above for the Print Ready Plus are provided, as well as design, layout, one round of proof corrections, reports and distribution.
“I didn’t do anything,” he said, looking up and then over to Ann, who fought not to smile. But before they could continue to the stairs, the front door burst open. A man ran in.
I helped him with his vocabulary homework. He is so proud that he is maintaining a 100% average when he takes these tests. He always credits me and the time we spend together working on this.
3140 SW 42nd Way
While Brad was in the attic, I had some downtime to finish some projects.
So I've spent a lot of time lately thinking back to the party themes I had for my birthdays growing up. Which brings us to this week's Question of the Week:
I want to extend a deep, warm, heartfelt, “HAILS Yeah!” of gratitude to all of my readers, fellow writers, friends, and family whose interest and enthusiasm buoyed me to the end. Your support means more to me than you imagine!
And of course, the longer it takes, the more there is at risk in drying and firing. Break one and then redo all those hours? Argh!
Notes: It is said that the reason to why there were only 20 lifeboats carried onboard was because Titanic was claimed unsinkable and there was no reason to overload the ship with too many lifeboats for she was not liable to any potential danger. Thomas Andrews who was Titanic’s architect suggested for another 36 lifeboats to be placed onboard but his suggestion was overruled.
The study examined the most commonly prescribed hormone replacement pill Prempro, that treats women in menopause for symptoms like hot flashes and night sweats. Before the 2002 findings (also spearheaded by NWHN), hormone replacement was being heralded and embraced by six million American women as a pharmaceutical way to fight back against menopause and stay young, sexy and healthy – until the dangerous downside (breast cancer, heart disease, stroke, blood clots) of the fountain of youth was revealed. Today, the number of women taking HRT has dropped by 50% and with this latest study, women who have to take the drug will hopefully know to take the lowest possible dose for the shortest period of time.
The cooking's the easy part - so far.
After making 200 cream puffs for Jun's wedding (post about the dessert bar and beautiful ceremony is in the works), I felt like a cream puff machine. Pastry cream...you don't freak me out anymore! And I have my friend Pastry Chef-in-Training Rosie who is attending Johnson & Wales to thank for that!
I enjoyed this one very much. It's a tale to immerse yourself in purely for the pleasure of losing oneself in a good story. Mystery, romance, loss, ghosts, three time periods, the meaning of family. Set in Australia and England, and best of all (for me), ultimately on the Cornish coast. It has it's flaws but it's a very good Summer read methinks.
As Joe Biden might say, Ladies and Gentlemen, is this what we have become? Are we really a nation of people who so swallow fear as a motivator that we’ll believe anything, even outright lies and slanderous accusations, if only we can believe that the other person will make our fear go away?
What did I Miss? - 46:36
Basically, the song is Kelly on the phone with his lady, asking him about some supposed dallying he was doing at the club with some other girls. Kelly goes off at one point during the song, telling the girl that her skanky friends aren't to be trusted, and that his girl should have just asked him about what happened, instead of accusing him based upon the word of her friends.
50% split equally between the 20 clubs
They need ice, baby.
However, there were some characters new to me. There was a live action character named Patito Feo (“Ugly Ducking” in English) which looks like a cross between Ugly Betty and Yo soy Betty, la fea.
I had been looking forward to picking up some of the new collections from
How's everyone today? Well, I do believe it has turned back to Winter. It has been a very gray day here. Cloudy and rainy from morning to night. The kind of day you want to stay inside and read a book, have a cup of tea and just relax. We had planned to be outside, but ended up inside when we were here. We started out being a bit lazy...there was another one of those wee hour thunderstorms that wakes me up and I couldn't go back to sleep. So, after roaming around the house at 2 am, I ended up staying in bed until after 7. Believe me, I hardly ever do that.
Actually he looked fabulous – as only Freddie could. But he might have already been living with the fact that he could become sick.
I don’t know if a god deemed man to follow religion in order to guide man, or if humans deemed that man should follow religion to control man… If religious leaders were simply teachers with answers to some of life’s questions, or if life questions of life are there to teach us to some higher evolution… If there’s lessons in everything, if everything’s by chance, or if everything is careful charted out by some sort of holy accountant in a fifty-five story office building with a commissary on the ground floor, and a basement you really should try to avoid…
Okay, okay, so Anjem Choudary was a bit outraged. But then he always is. He's the Islamic equivalent of Phillip Davies MP or that guy from Christian Voice in terms of playing the Indignant Self-Appointed Mouthpiece Who's Always A Phone Call Away When You Need An Angry Quote For Your Deadline. If Anjem Choudary getting pissed off constitutes a 'storm', we must be embroiled in one near-constantly. The only time Anjem Choudary isn't outraged is when he's asleep, and even then he's probably dreaming about it.
The dreaded spelling word practice is (as you probably know) a very important part of your student's week. I know from personal experience that many children do not enjoy spelling practice UNLESS it is fun. How can we make it fun?? Definitely NOT by the boring and not very effective "write your spelling words 3 times each" practice but instead by playing fun, educational games that will keep your students' interest throughout the entire week.
Here’s a rough draft of this month’s submission:
I email my insurance claims center and praise the phone person for handling Shark Man with such sweetness of spirit. I don’t know if she will get the message, but I pray she found other encouragement that day from her friends and co-workers or a husband at home who will cover her tears with his hug. I pray, too, for Shark Man. Looking at him through the lens of God I see a man, tired and disappointed, who only sees people as dollar signs. I think he carries great burdens on his shoulders. He needs to see God to be a good salesman or to be a human being.
Whisk together the cream, cocoa powder, sugar and salt in a large saucepan. Heat the mixture, whisking frequently, until it comes to a rolling boil and starts to foam up. Remove from the heat and whisk in both chocolates until completely melted, then whisk in the milk and vanilla. Blend the mixture in a food processor for 30 seconds until smooth, then chill thoroughly in the fridge before churning and freezing.
Now on to the food I had the egg, ham & cheese waffle sandwich with a rosemary béchamel sauce on top.
To make salad-
curbs and sidewalks. Intersection crossings are coloured. Cycling signal heads give the go ahead to cross intersections. Bike paths along the river have been completed. Now, connections are being made to the downtown, retail and commercial cores of neighbourhoods. Public bike share operated by the city appear around the city hall. With 5,000 bicycles in action, the commissioner feels that the service area is way too small. 10,000 bicycles would be a better number.
Previous studies have shown that climate change, the widely-accepted theory that man-made carbon emissions are causing the world to grow warmer, is very unpopular among conservatives, and especially white conservative males. In 2008, half of all conservatives believed in climate change. By 2010, only a third did, compared to more than 70 percent of liberals, according to a Gallup poll.
Instead of the desk, my coffee table beside the sofa contains all my day to day needs. Three baskets containing correspondence: Work, Non-work and Finance. Also my kindle, my Filofax, various index card boxes, notebooks, coasters for coffee, pots of pens, bookmarks and highlighters, a glass bowl of green and white glass "power stones" made for me by youngest daughter, a plant in a red cache-pot given by middle daughter, a box of tissues, a mouse-mat (quite redundant since I work on a MacBook Air with mouse trackpad, but it came from the London Review of books and has keyboard shortcuts for diacritics.
Under the direct orders of the Chhattisgarh Superintendent of Police, Ankit Garg, she had been verbally abused, stripped naked, given electric shocks, beaten, and sexually assaulted with stones and batons. The medical examination revealed annular tears to her spine and stones lodged inside her vagina and rectum.
He must have been bemused or confused when, right at the very start of the show, compere-for-the-evening Vivienne Soan explained her husband Martin Soan was at home but then he appeared naked, behind her, with a brown paper bag over his head. She appeared not to notice him.
はち：何読んでるの？
The tour ended and we met up at the City Tavern, a local haunt that was rebuilt after it burned before a wedding. The bride and bridesmaids perished in the blaze and, legend has it, the bride still shows up in pictures when there are weddings on sight. We didn’t experience any sightings, though, and after dinner we headed back to Jersey where they pump your gas for free.
Tribe isn’t something funky, something colourful or picturesque or quaint. Tribe is your elders – your family and community. They are the people who remember you when you were in diapers and who will never stop telling all those embarrassing stories about you. Feathers and drums are for everyday, not just for powwows.
Mahmoud has been left anxious and short tempered. “I have become very nervous since the attack. If someone is kidding with me I will try to hit them with anything at hand,” says Mahmoud. His anger has resulted in problems in school, for which he was suspended for a year. “As a result of my rushed reaction to incidents there are problems between me and the teachers as well as other students.”
I am willing to pay a referral fee of £100 directly to anyone who can introduce a rental property to my company.
Nor shall I stain my hand with action vile.
1 pathology
those guys shouldn’t be kicking that dam can
SW-197 Pearl & Jewel Stickers (60 pieces)
This species, despite its size, does not pose significant danger to humans. Whale sharks are actually quite gentle and can play with divers. Divers and snorkelers can swim with this giant fish without risk, apart from unintentional blows from the shark’s large tail fin.’
Below are two passages. Both characters speaking are 17 years old:
I used modge podge to affix the paper to the fronts of my files.
Just that morning, Creme woke up to the smell of bread being cooked. She had gotten out of bed she shared with her mother, though her mom had already gotten up, just like she always did to make breakfast in the morning to go to work. But it was today that they were going to go do the special thing. At least she thought it was today.
I go back to the nutritionist in a couple weeks and will weigh in then. I need to invest in a good reliable scale so I can monitor better at home. I weigh in at work but that is a scale that I don't trust much. It tells me I've lost about 9 pounds and while I enjoy that number I think I'll wait until I get the official weigh in to get too excited.
He adored mahAdEva, who lives in the hearts of yOgIs, desirous only of Him, bowing only to Him, dedicated only to him and taking only Him as support.
Again, I made sure to get swatches both with flash and without. Here is how it looks with my camera’s flash:
Some cherry trees started to have their flowers in this district, later than the usual time of bloom.
The three I picked, pretty much arbitrarily, at the cheese counter were ones I've never had before and know nothing about: Ballintubber, a softish cheddar with chives; Killeen Fenugreek, a goat-milk Gouda clone, seasoned as the name suggests; and Cooleeney, the pungent runny one essential to any cheese session line-up.
You’ll get to have a picnic in a small basket under a huge balloon, with a few of your friends, while floating hundreds of feet above the ground and seeing how beautiful the world is from up there. I almost experienced it but my trip got cancelled last minute due to weather conditions, and I never booked another trip.
The Israelis have given up territory and made countless concessions to the Palestinians without any reciprocity. Now the Palestinians are counting on the United Nations to unilaterally declare them a sovereign state. When not killing Israelis, they kill each other.
For all have sinned and fall short of the glory of God. Romans 3:23
The dreamChaser is back with a more simple and realistic blog layout.
Jeff Croteau, MA MLS, National Heritage Museum, Lexington MA
And what Grateful Dead tribute album would be complete with out a drum break? Kohoutek’s Nathan Bowles & Scott Verastro blast out and off with a “Drums” that will keep you twirling.
Unlike other android phones, the battery life is worth appreciating in HTC One X due to the 1.5GHz NVIDIA Tegra 3 quad core processor. The 1800 MAH battery lasts for a day even in the case of most heavy usage making it possible for you to roam charger free.
I would like to tell you that you have the same intuitive equipment like the animals do, to keep you safe in the right place at the right time. Yet you don’t believe it. Oh, you’ll use the Parking Angel, but not the Life Angel. The little stuff is easy for you, but the big stuff is a mystery. It’s the same process, “Dear Spirit, where should I live? Dear Spirit, where should I go?” Spirit is right there answering, and you perceive it as intuition. But the first thing you do is to say, “Naw. That’s me talking. No, I’m waiting for the voice in the sky. Sorry.” You still don’t understanding that that is how God speaks to individuals – through the little voice that holds your hand and is the first intuitive impression after a question.
– Texas Seeks More Time to Transfer Mentally Incompetent Prisoners
Yesterday I watched a big, fat, blue-gray pigeon fastidiously shop for home-building supplies, then carefully carry each piece up to a ledge on the side of a building. So much care was taken to be sure that each piece was the proper something or other - size? strength? shape?
Been jealous of my parents - they've been to CA like 5 times since my last post
For two years, Ian bugged us about coming back out for a visit. Keith and I finally managed to go in 2008 for another long weekend. The first thing Ian said to us was "where's your kids?", at which point I laughed, because this was the first break I'd had since the last time we out in CA.
Thank you, God.
So I did mention that I have a job waiting for me post-grad school. And that's pretty awesome, since I'm not one to enjoy uncertainty. But here's the thing - that set of interviews? Terrifying. There are a few reasons why, but two really stand out. I tend to be (too) honest when answering interview questions, and I really really wanted that job. I liked the job. I respect the company. I want to go back to Wisconsin. J really liked his old job too, and this would make things oh-so-straightforward. So it's safe to say that a lot was riding on that day of interviews.
Monday - Hamburgers, Home Fries & Corn on the Cob
“Kind of, but I don’t only want foam. I’d like a little bit of milk too.”
Specific types of trade marks (e.g. collective, certification and guarantee marks) seem more frequently to take a place on the market as a more balanced position between individual trade marks and geographical indications, as they may be allowed to benefit from the best advantages of both types of right and to obtain protection for geographical terms even in those countries where no register for geographical indications exists. Nevertheless, the ability of such marks to fulfil the functions of a geographical indication is also under discussion.
It was decided
HQ Kites and Designs
I spent a year or so finding things for the house, none of them were expensive, but I think all of them are lovely.
I guess Vaughn forgot about the Man from U.N.C.L.E. episode he and Tim did together in 1967.
I had hoped to do a Christmas count-down in the lead-up to the big day, hosting some of the best and worst of my festive songs. But as it is, please enjoy these couple of gems, one is a Christmas cracker, the other most definitely a turkey.
* Wake Up Sinners by The Dirt Daubers. What we have here basically is an acoustic alter ego of the Legendary Shack Shakers.
I thought I was only going to make the one Easter card this year, but then decided to make one for each of the two babies in the family. Both cards feature a lovely illustration from Beatrix Potter's The Tale of Benjamin Bunny.
Lisa Egan, 31, Cliffside Park, N.J.
You’re going to notice I keep going back to OPSEC in the blog. It’s that damn important and IMHO it just can’t be stressed enough. People like to talk and it’s going to be a challenge to get them to curb that instinct.
I had an anxiety attack. I found myself on the side of the road in my car, on the streets of Accra, in a neighborhood I knew well. Lost, out of breath and terrified. I had to call a friend to come and save me.
Shipping Method: Pen. Malaysia (Weight: 2.40kg)
Oliver: "What? Huh? I'm sorry, guys. But I had a home. And it's a Park Avenue townhouse in pre-gentrified New York!"
You also started rolling over this past month, too! You love tummy time, so you always look a little confused when you roll over from your tummy to your back, as if to say, "uhm, oops. I didn't mean to do that!" Then you kick your little leg up and roll onto your side and look around a while. You are so cute :) We have finally decided that we can stretch out our eating schedule a little! You now can go 4 hours between feedings during the day, and 5 to 6 hours at night! You have been going to bed around 9:00 and will nurse once during the night, then you wake around 8 or 8:30.
- Promote music that would otherwise not have a chance to play live in different areas.
I also have another of Thumper's birthday photos that I was playing with recently. I have run a whole bunch of Pioneerwoman actions over this shot, and I liked the end result.
The dissident trustees called for a secret ballot by faculty; Inside Higher Ed suggested that administrators indicated the board didn’t want a vote. For tenured faculty, the chance to be part of a larger institution must be attractive, while non-tenured faculty, along with perhaps some administrative staffers, may see a truncated future in a merged institution.
If you’ve ever looked at a map of production breweries in the CT/NY area, you probably noticed there ain’t jack squat in Fairfield County. Well, beer lovers, raise your mugs… Half Full Brewery is in town. Poised to open around June/July, they’ve set up shop at 43 Homestead Avenue in the Harbor Point section of Stamford, CT. Half Full is the hop-child of Conor Horrigan, who used to work at New England Brewing Company and who got his MBA at UConn to make sure Half Full would be a business success. Right now they’ve got a nanobrewery set up and are in the process of getting a nice 20 barrel microbrewery system installed. Around May, expect to hear some info about touring the brewery, doing some tastings, and other beer related awesomeness. You can definitely “Look Forward to More…” as their slogan says. We look forward to more, also, and will keep you updated as June gets closer.
I include that in my prayers.
She lay, clearly unconscious, facing the fire. That was the lip of the Sherim, then. Taslin turned, rising to a kneeling crouch, reaching for Dora, but already there was a dark, shapeless cloud around the back of her head. Rel's blood went cold even as he engaged Clearsight. The cloud became thick black spikes, shining in the firelight, stretching up from Dora's head as if they were coming out of her ear.
On the other hand, the vampire bats are missing. In a place where a year ago we filmed vampires sneaking up on deer with the thermal camera, now there are none. An evening’s wait revealed no more than a mouse and two rabbits (which of course in their own way are just as interesting.)
America’s Got Talent
So, when she said "poo poo," I bolted out of that pool, knowing that she must be pretty desperate if she's willing to go when we're not at home. As I was running upstairs, cradling Collette, to the bathroom, I realized there was already a bulge in Collette's bathing suit. I was too late! Once we were in the bathroom, it didn't take me long to realize that she was done pooping and it was now trapped in her bathing suit. This was a low moment in parenting for me, to date. Getting the poop into the toilet and trying my damnedest to not get any on my hands or all over my sister's bathroom was nearly impossible. Meanwhile, Collette was crying that she wanted to go home to poop (a little late for that!!) and fighting my every move to get her de-pooped.
"Gotta keep my eyes on him Betty, he's a star."
The story is multi-layered and although I can't confess to understanding everything that happens in the book I think that is actually part of it's charm. 'Advent' seems like the type of book that you'll pick up over and over again and each time you'll reread it and discover as well as understand, more of the secrets contained within its pages.
That I love you means not I’m blind to your sin
I’m delighted that Tamsyn Murray has agreed to be interviewed on Absolute Vanilla.
When I went to see a matinée of the movie Braveheart with a friend that summer I expected to be entertained, but I did not suspect that a movie could cause such a wellspring of emotion to rise up inside of me. I remember walking through the parking lot afterwards and almost being amazed that cars were driving by. People were going shopping, and life was continuing on as if nothing had happened! Didn’t these people have any sense of the sacred!? Did they not know that there are some things worth giving one’s life for!? How could they sit around eating Cinnabons at the mall while others of the human species were giving their lives for ideals!? I was ready to die for……..well, I’m not sure what exactly, but I was ready to die for something!
From Maggie:
I think my story is similar to your story
(If you zoom in on the picture, you’ll see it flicking its tongue as it scans for food.)
Natalie doesn't know that, of course, so she keeps trying to get the vehicle started, even when the killer tries to stab her through the roof. From above, Damon is seen struggling to free himself from the deadly noose, but Natalie doesn't hear him begging her not to start the car. His shoe flying at the windshield startles Natalie, and she puts the pedal to the metal, sending Damon flying into the treetops. The killer darts into her path, so Natalie tries to kill him, then makes the car go in reverse. The lack of tension on the rope sends Damon plummeting back down, where he smacks into the hood. Bye, Pacey!
What fun that was, not only seeing Jessica again but also just the whole aspect of going and auditioning and reading lines and remembering lines and all of that.....
I now popped the dough into the fridge to use the next morning, but if you want to use straight away, shape into 25-30 buns, and leave on a tray covered with a clean tea towel in a warm spot for 1 hour, until they have risen to almost double their size. Preheat the oven to 220C.
Here is the completed tray of cookies after the exchange. Cookies featured this year were: Peppermint Cocoa Kiss Cookies, Triple Ginger (using crystalized ginger, fresh ginger, and powdered ginger), Red Velvet Cookies, with Cream Cheese Icing, Potato Chip Cookies, Lemon Volcanos, Oatmeal Cinnamon, Butterfinger, Snickerdoodles, Pecan Triangles, and Noels. All so good!
‘Strike off the heads of infidels.’
In addition to the grown women who snatched up my items with the quickness, the debate girls were also in the mix, grabbing items.
I don't even know what to do. I hate not being able to fix him. I hate seeing Dr. Jekyll turn into Mr. Hyde. And when he's Mr. Hyde, there is no reasoning with him. There is no taking a minute to stop and think. There is no recalling everything he's learned in the hospital. There's nothing but rage. And I hate walking on eggshells with my stomach in a knot, wondering what will set him off next. It's scary. And with everything else going on, I feel like a cartoon that's hanging off a cliff and someone keeps peeling my fingers away, one at a time. I don't have many fingers left.
The odds of anyone being killed by a downwardly-mobile pig are high.
The Lion King is essentially Hamlet with a happy ending while maintaining a certain richness. Plus, Jeremy Irons is the greatest of villains as the uncle, Scar.
b. Ask Questions:
Favorite Chocolate: I feel that salty foods and chocolate make a great pairing, which is one of the reasons I enjoy bacon & chocolate. While in Portland, Oregon, I found the Xocolatl de David Chocolate Bar with Parmigiano Reggiano, and this was an excellent combination, the saltiness of the cheeses working well with the sweet chocolate. I can easily see other similar cheeses working well too with chocolate.
Earlier this week, The Guardian splashed on the results of a new YouGov poll, which showed that 69% of voters support a reformed House of Lords – a key policy favoured by Nick Clegg, the Deputy Prime Minister. The poll, commissioned by Unlock Democracy, revealed that just 5% of the public favour the status quo – a fully appointed second chamber.
Bowe's is a decent, untouristy, unpretentious boozer that happens to take its beer a bit more seriously than most. We need dozens more like it in this town.
But many ancient cultures believe in the periodicity of events and carefully marked the periodicity with deadly mathematical precession. The natural periodicity gave them the idea that life also follows the similar periodicity which gave them comfort in the continuity of life forms with certain cyclical periodicity symptomatic with larger natural cyclical periodicity. This continuous form of life in one form or others led to the theory of reincarnation of life forms. They believed that many life forms are part of larger natural cyclical periodicity which gave them an attitude to respect to nature. This theory helped people to watch their actions as their consequences may spread over next life times also and helped societies deal with complex issues like criminal justice, decriminalizing certain aspects of human behavior. Prostitution which is a worst translation in to English a very positive term from Indian languages –Vyabhichara Vrithi or Jara Vrithi or Bhoga Vrithi-was decriminalized and legalized long time back. The Term vyabhicahara is used to designate wavering budhi that leads to the chains of actions and consequences-the judging faculty of life forms differentiating right from wrong- as done in Bhagavad Gita which dictates that one should have budhi avyabhicharini-single pointed thinking process. From Chanakya to Kakatiya Kings the state considered vyabhichara as a profession (both male and female no discrimination here) and taxed the incomes at 10% and used this money to maintain law enforcement agencies. Many western countries like Netherlands (Holland) are following the same path.
You are super sweet, Michele, and it has been such a joy getting to know you better as a Girl Friday. You are such a hard worker and I appreciate all that you do. I'm the last on the hop, if you are following in order, you should have arrived from Lisa's blog! The next stop is Gayatri. (Otherwise, please see the list at the end of my post for more fabulous clean and simple birthday cards!)
It was a bit of a curate’s egg, but a really good experience, I think you have to be brought up with them to enjoy wines like this.
* 1 small yellow onion, minced fine
Of course, it’s not up to me whether or not she takes a flight of very pleasantly designed, open-air style steps from one lousy floor to another. She was, after all, going up a flight and not down. Perhaps she has a fear of thigh muscles. Perhaps it is her first day on prosthetic feet. Perhaps she had signed an agreement whereby she has agreed to leave the stair-climbing to the professionals.
Yamaha Jet Ski WaveRunner
Now for this week's challenge. With the US holiday of Thanksgiving right around the corner, we want to take this opportunity to...
A nice new steak and hamburger place opened recently in Testaccio, Rome. Nicely decorated, American-style food, even a live-size cow statue welcomes you upon arrival. Barrels of peanuts, great service, smiling waiters and waitresses. I had a simple hamburger, which was delicious, if it weren't that the bun was a bit soggy on the bottom. The baked potato was perfectly cooked. The desserts were divine! As you can see from the picture, my daughter and I couldn't decide which one to take. Sayaka settled for a delicious cheesecake with strawberry sauce and I chose the chocolate cake.
I received email notice of an upcoming Austin event featuring a film and discussion of restorative justice and in particular the sort of victim-offender dialogue described in this recent Grits post. Here are the details:
Case from his official website
Seventeen more days that I can sustain her and offer her the protection of my body. Seventeen more days of sweet little pokes and kicks. Seventeen more days of precious little hiccups. Seventeen more days to somberly, but joyfully wear this big round belly that would ordinarily imply happy new life!
Buff: Sorry, I didn't mean to ... It's just that with your boobs out ... and your not wearing underwear ... I ... Uh ... I need a drink!
- Stewing beef boneless 100% Canadian beef $3.49/lb ($7.69/kg)
Meanwhile, I must say that Rooftop Prince is a crack-tastic drama. After so many years, my #1 favourite K-drama (“My Girl”) might possibly be dethroned if RP’s ending doesn’t disappoint. ^^ It’s a great mix of suspense, sentimentalism, humour, romance, and a little ‘action’ (*cough*) and the script breaks boundaries, all which pretty much sits well with me. (Interestingly enough, “My Girl” also had these elements too… I appreciate dramas that have great scripts beautifully melding everything together, and especially with mystery because that gives the drama extra smarts and brainpower.)
There were several books blocked by multiple requests, but two were picked by Random.org.
We had a little bit of food that Amy brought up stairs when she secured the house, she says that it was just reactive, she noticed things going on outside and just covered windows and grabbed the essentials and then worried about keeping the kids quiet. But she told me last night of all the little odds and ends that we needed. Baby supplies and some more food, but almost anything would be worth getting upstairs to help our situation. So I needed to go downstairs and get what I could.
Sadly, we've come to the seventh and last day of May Monster Madness. I'd like to thank Annie, of Annie Walls blog, for masterminding this blog hop, and my co-minion Ked, of Something WicKED This Way Comes blog, for helping me to spread the word about all the macabre merriment. This event has been eerily entertaining and I appreciate everyone who dropped by to check out my contributions to the fiendish festivities. I also enjoyed getting around to see all the diverse and fascinating monster themed posts put up by my fellow May Monster Madness participants.
All I can say is, “Sara-J – thank you! You are very special and totally wonderful!”
My deep affection for cheesy 80s pop remains unabated to this day, and a song like Hue and Cry’s glorious horn infused “Labour of Love”. Yes, the ridiculously dated production is a little sad, but under the retro is a strong melody and biting political lyrics. When faced with Hue and Cry’s weepy ballads, I tend to cringe. But this song oozes funk. It is by far the best song they ever produced. That’s saying something as they continue to put out records even now.
but the week before the weather was nice and sunny,
When squash is soft, lentils should be soft (but with a firm bite) as well. Add them in to the pan. Serve over rice with a good scattering of cilantro.
Good Shepherd
Village School, by Miss Read (Fairacre #1) – I’ve been meaning to dive into the Fairacre books for years and finally made the time. If the first book is any indication, these stories about life in a tiny English village during the 1950s, as narrated by the village schoolmistress, are sweet and witty. I loved my first visit to Fairacre and will be going back at the earliest opportunity.
5) Caring for a friend who has been anxious and is slipping off of the church.
Later, at Peebles Island, I found out from conversation with Chris that it was very likely captured by Beauregard's Confederate forces, possibly at Bull Run, Virginia, July 21, 1861. This is not "the Standard" that James Gilmour and his comrade Francis Perry rescued; but I would imagine that it was captured during the same incident he describes in his letters to his brother Robert, on his return to Washington, after the disastrous Battle of Bull Run.
I will tell you what has changed, the new Jell-O mold and great-granny would not have hung this one on the wall. People have apparently found spandex and consider this to be the new Jell-O mold. Well, it is not people!
We constantly analyse and judge so we understand through that sifting who we are in relation to what we observe and experience.
Last week, I was playing a game with an eye towards reviewing it, but you'll realise that this isn't a review post. This is because I quickly found out that the game (I won't name it, because I may still try to review it in the future) somehow managed to contain all of my RPG pet-peeves, so I stopped playing too soon to actually have enough material for a proper review. Unfortunately, this isn't rare in the amateur development community because inexperienced developers are prone to "overdoing" the things they think are good in commercial RPGs. In this post, I'm going to go through some of the most common mistakes rookie developers make when producing their first RPG and hopefully it'll help people avoid falling into these common pitfalls!
What is your fondest memory of sewing/crafting/designing with your mother?
"How are there survivors in New York City? But none in any of the other infected areas?"
The seventh day of each weekly lesson had about six group discussion questions to answer and discuss together. The book said the group discussion should last about 45 minutes, but unless you have a really talkative group, I don’t think the questions would necessarily take 45 minutes to discuss. A lot of the group discussion questions were still slightly personal in nature.
Taru quickly followed Tripti, She was walking really fast for a sixty year old woman; soon she took a turn and entered a room. Taru followed her but stood right at her place, absolutely transfixed.
Newer cell lines from fetal tissue includes PER.C6 cell line from Merck, which used tissue from an 18 week old baby whose mother aborted it because she didn’t know who its father was. They also used tissue from a 21 week baby and this line is being used in flu and TB vaccines as well as experimental vaccines that researchers are still working on, including maleria and rabies vaccines, cancer and HIV vaccines. The tissue used was from both babies eyes.
I can feel your presence when nobody is around,
Meanwhile, anti-death penalty activists linked to TOC continue to protest vehemently against the dismissal of Yong’s appeal to get the court to reopen his case by the Court of Appeal on Wednesday, one of whom even appeared to ‘incite’ violence against the Singapore President:
So as he wandered the streets of his memory, taking pit stops thinking within memory of all the lives he had taken, all the women he had made widows, all the men he had slain, all the children he had made fatherless; there was an order to Irish war fare you see, do not kill the defenseless, do not kill women and children. That he could understand because it was coded, it was part of law, it made sense, it was logical.
If the stretching part seems intimidating, don't let it! It really is the best part and quite fun. I stretched it long (like a snake), brought the ends together to form a big circle, squished both sides together, folded it in half (see first stretching picture above), then stretched it long again and repeated. Do what feels right to you, it'd be hard to mess up.
The rain has eased off a little this morning, but everything is exceedingly wet and I can only just see the wooded slopes of Cefn Rhyswg from my window.
DCWV paper pack
In researching Wolf Blood my last book I discovered two things that I longed to include but which, though true, simply didn’t fit in the story I was trying to tell. I tried to weave them in but they didn’t work and in the end my firm inner editor consigned them to the ‘trash’.
Rnd 5: Repeat rnd 3 – 79 sts. K 1 rnd.
This photo shows a closer view of my Copic-filled image. I set this lovely fairy toward the side of my cut rectangle so I'd have plenty of room to add a sentiment and some embellishments. This magnificent stamped sentiment is an oldie from Art Gone Wild! A QuicKutz manger and north star die cuts provide divine accents. A bit of Diamond Stickles covers her wings and the poinsettia she's holding. You can find out the basics of how I make my punched poinsettias here.
MYLUNE: The very very bestest of furry flappy friends! It’s just so beautiful!
Until recently, Taib’s system of patronage ensured almost total control, land alienation continued apace and Sarawak’s politics remained extraordinarily dull. In a land with isolated villages and little infrastructure, news traveled slowly, votes were bought, government promises never materialised and disaffected constituents lacked the means to challenge decisions10.
A. A midwife in private practice is able to make a personal commitment to the individual woman, and work professionally with her as her primary carer.
I'll be honest, I haven't had many Oakshire beers and Ill Tempered Gnome doesn't rock my socks either. O'Dark is an amazing beer! To the Doc, it encompasses what a CDA or whatever we want to call it this week, should be. It's roasty, it's hoppy and it has great depth. Period. Don't have my tasting notes, but it makes a statement that others should be compared too. This is the epitome of NW brewing. Big, overblown, off balance and obnoxious. Finesse, artistic balance not in the cards here.
Pandas! I have been to the San Diego Zoo before, but I didn't get to see the pandas. They have a brand new panda exhibit that makes it much easier for the crowds to move through and see them. You have to be silent to walk past. We learned that pandas eat 84 pounds of bamboo a day. That's one reason most zoos can't have them. The San Diego Zoo grows a lot of its own bamboo for the pandas. They were pretty amazing to watch and see in person.
In a report produced by Service Management Group, The Boston Consulting Group and Barkley (renowned U.S. marketing and advertising firms) Millenials prefer to see corporations actively engaged in cause campaigns. This young demographic reports being drawn to brands that are co-branding with causes enabling them, the Millenials, to make purchases as a form of support. A 2011 Cone/Echo Global CR Study (produced by Boston, MA-based Cone Communications) provided support for the Millenials’ preferences in revealing 93% of consumers surveyed want to know what companies are doing to make the world a better place. (71% of consumers surveyed; however, report being confused by the message companies use to talk about their charitable efforts.)
Before we announce the Fourth challenge we need to announce the winner of the third challenge "With Love"
“These most crafty enemies have filled and inebriated with gall and bitterness the Church, the spouse of the Immaculate Lamb, and have laid impious hands on her most sacred possessions.
Do I look ahead...Absolutely! Blogging, designing, picturing and creating is a part of me and I have not abandoned any part of what lies in my heart of hearts.
Are you working on anything else?
He talked of the need for greater productivity from Cuban workers and the importance of the economic reforms to communism’s future.
Again, this passage of the Roman Catechism is clearly drawing from the language of Genesis 1. And in Gen 1:10 God explicitly calls the dry land terram. And now, for the fourth time, I put this question to Bob: If terram means the entire globe rather than the dry land, then how can the Catechism say that God filled it with living creatures, "as He had already filled the air and water" (quemadmodum antea aquas et aëra)? The terram here is something distinct from the air and the water, therefore it cannot be the entire globe. But we know what the terram is. It’s just what God said in Gen 1:10, it’s the “dry land” (aridam). This completely dismantles Bob’s reading of geocentrism into this passage of the Roman Catechism.
Leaving the bottom shelf pretty wide open for the rest of the awkward shaped items.
I went onto the boat deck — it was deserted and lonely. The wind whistled through the stays, and blackish smoke poured out of the three forward funnels; the fourth funnel was a dummy for ventilation purposes. It was the kind of a night that made one feel glad to be alive.
Man wouldn’t have landed on the moon if we had given up due to failure of successive lunar missions before we eventually landed on the moon. Never limit yourself to something. Believe that you can do it, and, with God by your side, you shall do it. Do not let anyone tell you that the sky is the limit, afterall, there are human footsteps on the moon.
‘I was holding the entire skin, inside out, in my arms, completely bewildered,’ Ms Avins writes. ‘I looked at the clock. The process had taken about 40 minutes.
Turn it upside down for your friend to see.
Letting go of self-hatred and the lies we believe about our bodies can open us to the freedom of loving ourselves and seeing ourselves as God sees us.
the harmonic accompaniment of heaven-sent Souls
I love clips from the old shows, and past winners.
102. Rendition
"And what's your timing on that, Doug?"
I used lots of My Minds Eye paper, Papertrey Ink stamps and dies and some beautiful twine from the Twinery to create my project. I always loved wrapping presents when I was younger and it felt like each little advent box was a chance to decorate a small gift. I plan to put candy, activities and fun surprises in each box (yes, I know I'm a few days late but I think the kids will be okay with year ;) )
My garden is vast and its also uncared for….If I had more cash, I’d have a professional completely tidy it up and make it a paradise…
tortilla
Or perhaps I should say it's the kind of thing I could not look at without breaking into a smile even though I'm Jewish. As I looked around me on the street, I began to think I had seen an optical illusion up on the tracks. None of the wizened Chicagoans around me bothered to take note of the spectacle above. I looked at the passersby focusing on the smart phones or keeping their heads down as they walked into the wind. Did they even notice the Santa Train?
Let’s extend this idea of actors being related to writers. Let’s say I have a role to cast. I want a male actor to play a cowboy. I have three different actors. I have Clint Eastwood, Jack Black, and Robert Deniro. Same story, different actors. Can you see how the choice of actor–the choice of the voice–becomes essential to how the story will play out? If I cast the wrong actor for the story I as a director want to tell, I can have a disaster, even though ALL THREE ACTORS are highly skilled and talented.
Edgar Broughton Band- Out Demons Out
The sign at the entrance boasts of the use of Swiss technology in the production process – a definite sign of quality according to our new friends.
Welcome to the Belles 'n Whistles Spring Release Blog Hop!!! Today is the day! 16 new stamps are being released and are available and shipping as of today!!! There are 2 new collections, the Fairy Friends Collection and the Sweet Art Girls Collection. I'm sure the Sweet Art Girls are familiar to some of you already ;-)
Sleep tight everybody.
After a long pause, the door opened. A small woman in her 90′s stood before me. She was wearing a print dress and a pillbox hat with a veil pinned on it, like somebody out of a 1940′s movie.By her side was a small nylon suitcase. The apartment looked as if no one had lived in it for years. All the furniture was covered with sheets.There were no clocks on the walls, no knickknacks or utensils on the counters. In the corner was a cardboard box filled with photos and glassware.
Olfert SM. Reproductive outcomes among dental personnel: A review of selected exposures. J Can Dent Assoc 2006; 72: 821-825.
ブッダ：なかなかアツイけど、めちゃくちゃだね。
Directions say to hold magnet over nail for 10 seconds. I like 15-20. Maybe I count faster....test it out and see what works for you. Again, it settles back together a little so maybe the extra time doesn't help as much as I think.
L-O-V-E – Tike! Too bad the only stable/normal couple on Glee couldn’t even get their turn in the spotlight.
While I was working on them I learned "teatime" in the UK also refers to mealtime. I always thought it was the actual teatime at 5pm, you know, the one with delicious cookies and biscuits, hee! Anyway, this goes to show you that we learn something new everyday.
I still have three more weeks to enjoy my holiday here in Argentina, during which I hope to see more of my friends and family and enjoy visiting all the familiar places that mean so much to me ...
I do not know why it has freakishly huge balls and I'm not sure I want to know, but clearly somebody got all huffy with the management and made then turn the one in Joss so only the sushi chefs can see it now. My feeling is, if you can't take the tanuki testicles, get out of the sushi bar.
so, though i did not pursue photography the way i had hoped to this year, there were a lot of unexpected opportunities along the way. still... i had hoped to take a class, maybe go on some photo walks with friends or fellow-photographers i've met online, maybe purchase some new equipment and bells and whistles to aid in my photography, and at the very least, take pictures consistently. instead, i set my camera down for months at a time and even came close to losing interest at one point.
Evil Joy out – to be Evil Joy in hopes of scaring away Evil Tears…I know…I lied….I will be Evil Joy today! :)
Every Christmas, my side of the family pick names out of a hat, and whomever you choose, you have to make a present for, and the limit of money to use is around $15.
"The fighting", even though by its nature is disliked by the human soul because of the liability, of being killed, orbeing taken as a captive, or being injured, with the wasting ofthe wealth, the damaging of the industries, the destruction ofthe country, the spreading of fear and awe in the souls and the (possibility) of being exiled from one's homeland, Allah had made ready an immensely good reward that cannot be imagined by a human soul.
Most of the pages dedicated to information and techniques are also framed with a floral border (with a different print for each chapter). If you really loathe "girly" things this book's styling is probably not going to be for you but I found it pleasingly pretty without being too twee, with a focus on bright colours and fresh-feeling patterns.
If I may tell a little story from my experience. Over 56 years ago, when I was a teenager, I saw a girl that I thought was the most beautiful girl I’d ever seen. She looked to me like a movie star. I had no hopes of even talking to her, but her face haunted my dreams. Later I met her at school and she smiled at me and of course, my face turned red. What was I feeling? I believe it was EROS, the love of desire, the love of passion.
Oprah, teddy bears at shrines, pretending to care when children are abducted and killed, state intervention replacing family concern, killing God and killing truth, believing only we matter, screaming that the world owes us a living. It’s not just High Park but Canada burning. Don’t fiddle while it happens.
The 2012 technical regulations included a large number of quite complex and specific rules regarding systems controlling the engine, clutch and gearbox. It transpires that these are simply previous technical directives being rolled up into the main package of regulations. Only the aforementioned throttle pedal maps being a new regulation to combat hot and cold blowing.
Use royal icing to decorate the skeletons.
Your double layer skirt is now attached to the yoke
Her: A fanny-ole.
In other beer festival news, Beervana is looking to be bigger than ever. Earlier this year the Brewers Guild of NZ sold the festival to David Cryer, the former Brewers Guild chairman. The festival has moved from the town hall to the Westpac stadium. While the town hall offered fantastic aesthetics, a major downside to holding the event there was that all food had to be supplied by the contracted caterer. The stadium offers the opportunity to serve food from some of Wellington’s best chefs alongside the nation’s best beers. Tickets are on sale at www.beervana.co.nz.
Here, have a random pokemon comic:
13. He wears more sunblock than I do. And he's black. And I'm not. Hmmm.
2. WOD 12.2 of the CrossFit Open was posted on Wednesday night:
for they will be called sons of God.
Now, I'm currently attending two different groups, though the first is not really a support group, per se, but a class to educate the members of the group about mental illness. The is a course sponsored by NAMI, and is the Family to Family Education program which lasts 12 weeks. This weekend will be our last class, and I'll be sorry to see it end, but feel like we made a connection with at least one of the families and I hope that we'll be able to keep in touch.
Now I just need to hit the thrift store again and find the perfect comfy chair! I've always wanted to try my hand at refinishing a chair! :D
Brothers who are not brainwashed take ruins and rest
Leave the links to your poems in the comments of this post, then go visit your fellow writers’ sites and read their work. Remember to leave only positive comments in the spirit of sharing and not critiquing. We look forward to reading your poems!
She slapped me hard.
i'd love any suggestions you may have of useful sites or suggestions for what i should plant! please share!!
The DT has voted and here are the results...
Nwakama revealed that when they got to Ore, in Ondo State, the driver stopped for the passengers to eat and buy some things. According to him, on approaching Okada town, the bus had a flat tyre. He said: “The driver stopped to change the tyre. We all alighted from the bus. One nursing mother in the bus refused to come down. While the driver was still arguing with the nursing mother, about 15 armed men swooped on us and ordered everybody, at gunpoint to follow them into the bush.
It was one week after Frank attacked Marlene and then mysteriously disappeared. Marlene believed the Beboodle got him and I believed Marlene went into a fugue state, killed him, somehow disposed of the body and then blamed it on a haunted doll. So, you know, as a good friend is supposed to, I watched her behavior closely, just in case she decided to off someone else.
I want to be stronger, faster, leaner, thinner. I can achieve my goals with hard work and dedication. I need to stay focused on the task at hand and I will succeed.
This is hands down my favorite serum. It covers the widest range of skin types and I use it on almost all of my makeup clients. Its based with hyaluronic acid, a water loving acid that binds 1,000 times its own weight in water. This super hydrating serum can rapidly change the appearance of your skin by smoothing fine lines and helping your makeup go on like a dream.
I thought about it too and how could I heal others being a novice in energy healing. I still did, because I knew I had to start somewhere and with this knowing that I’m prepared to follow my life purpose now.
Writing 100 words every day: Wed, Sun, Mon - no; Thurs, Fri, Sat, Tues - yes
and with that, i'm off and running through my to-do list for the day so i can be ready to play with you all tonight!
Politics masquerading as matrimony. Austen was a mathematician of social interaction, and her novels are impossibly, preposterously good. Emma happens to be my favorite.
The importation of Afro-Americans as slaves, starting early in America’s history, led to the Civil War, followed by the horrid “Jim Crow” era until the Civil Rights movement in the 1960s. These days they are minority population smaller than Hispanics and, thanks to a variety of liberal welfare programs, are too often a dysfunctional element of American society.
The Hungry Hollow Food Co-Op is such an organization, and has been serving the community in this way since 1973. Still tiny but slowly expanding over the years, Hungry Hollow offers an impressively wide variety of grocery items including pantry items and dry goods, beautifully fresh produce (including hard-to-find specialty items like local fiddleheads in season!), body care & household products, locally-baked organic breads and pastries, and a thorough selection of deli items made on-premise. There is something delicious and truly healthy for everyone, including salads, sandwiches, home made soups and sweets, most of which are vegetarian, vegan and/or gluten-free.
7. I think penguins are absolutely adorable and wish to own one as a pet.
In boxes sent from Nigeria and labeled as containing gemstones, customs officials locate 22 whole and 44 pieces of tusks. Full report
First, my finger is wonderful. I'm compensating a lot so I don't bump it, but I've learned to be quite quick at typing 9 fingers and I've also managed to learn how to write my signature without using that finger...takes a bit longer but it's legible!!!
It has shown in the amount that I have posted on here, it shows up in the work that I am doing, and in the time that I spend with my family. I have been retreating, much more then usual. The only good thing is that I recognize it and am trying to get a grip on it before it takes hold permanently. At least I have still been keeping up with my physical fitness and I know that has been helping my mental state.
1/2 mashed banana
Then my wife came and she brought the pizza and we pulled everything out in my room and ate dinner together. We got done eating pizza and then we did a quick sound and light check in the auditorium and then got things together for the night. Then it was time for our performance. I will say that the performance by the cast was incredible! They did a spectacular job and so did my tech crew. I was proud of both groups of students and I have to say that in the ten years I’ve worked at East Middle, that was probably the smoothest performance we’ve had. I would like to think it’s because the teacher’s have had ten years of experience together. We got done with everything and I stayed behind and closed down the auditorium and turned all the lights left and went home.
We will start with reviews, tips and hints for UK festivals and then expand them to Europe and the rest of the world. We also want YOU to contribute! Give us tyour tips for festivals, reviews and information
I can't be letting small minded strangers with their hate, hiding behind 'Anon' etc. stop me from writing in my own little corner of the bloggiverse.
Written and Directed by Richard Curtis.
WHAT DOES OUR TONGUE REVEAL?
Unfortunately, the bartender apparently 'had a rough night' the night before, and did not have all the ingredients left for this drink (the thought of bankers 'partying it up' and 'going crazy with the truffle cocktails' made us laugh a little - between my tears from not being able to try this amazing sounding drink. Must come back another time.).
Hope your week is off to a great start!! xoxo.
so, yeah, mama needed to keep everyone busy!
If Wednesday wins its last home game against the already-relegated Wycombe Wanderers and gets all three points, it will be promoted to Championship without worrying about the United’s result.
The craftsmen and the people of Ephesus were so obsessed with the goddess Diana that they rallied together in the local outdoor mega theater and shouted, “Great is Artemis (Diana) of the Ephesians” for two whole hours. Talk about tantrums – my kids usually stop screaming after about 20 minutes. These men and women did not stop for two whole hours. The Ephesians were blinded by their misplaced obsession which caused them to miss God’s message.
We had prepared for the learning walk for months, explaining to teachers in both spoken and written format what would happen. Still, the reality of eight adults entering a classroom can be overwhelming and walkers expressed empathy for those observed, demonstrating sensitivity to the courage required to open the doors of one’s classroom to adult visitors. We agreed that although we were not giving feedback, teachers deserve a thank you e-mail from me.
I hope you love it.
Obama appointed a deficit commission loaded with weasels and let ex-Senator Alan Simpson, a vicious lap dog for the financial oligarchy, take center stage to preach in favor of adding additional financial burdens on the bottom 99 percent while corporations and the fabulously wealthy are handed even more breaks. Those who oppose his plan, he said, are the forces of "darkness," and he said it in such a way that news media treated his rap as though it had some element of truth. And where was Obama? Ceding ground.
This week, the recipe was for gougères, which is this little cheese biscuit thing. Very light and fluffy on the inside. (Warning: This entry is photo-heavy, as D was nice enough to let me use his camera, and as a result, I went crazy with it.
This gives ISPs enormous power to select and censor information, and that in turn attracts the envy of the security services – organisations set up to ‘defend the State’ – by which they mean ‘protect the oligarchy’. Once the oligarchy is so unassailable as to keep any intruders out, it becomes stale, smug, mediocre…and incompetent. The vicious circle now comes into play, for the more process-driven, fruitless and incompetently administered Establishment policies are, the more ordinary voters and taxpayers become angry. They therefore have to be watched via surveillance cameras and £13bn GCHQ digital monitoring programmes 24/7.
I remember when I really knew that John was cool. We were staying at our grandmother’s in the Bronx and we all went to Sam Goody’s; it was a wonderful trip from Buffalo where we had escaped the reality of Buffalo for the reality of the Bronx, which was not that much better, but at least it wasn’t Buffalo, and it was closer to Manhattan. And we all went into this wonderful record store Sam Goody’s and came back with some records. I think I was about 14, so John was about 16; he put on an album, and, y’all forgive me, but it started to play: Dah-dah-dah-da-dah, I feel free, dah-dah-da-dah-dah, I feel free— And it was the first cut on the first album by Cream, and it was just so…it was just wonderful. And I said, “Wow, he knows something, this guy, he really knows something!” And it turned out he did know something; he had these amazing scores on his SATs.
A rundown on cost:
Blind Husbands is available on DVD through Kino International. The disc also includes an early talkie, The Great Gabbo (1929), starring Von Stroheim as a mentally unbalanced ventriloquist.
Sleepy, tired, overwhelming desire to curl up in my nest and not move.
Dec. 9: THE MAGIC OF CHRISTMAS (memories of my grade school Christmas pageants, featuring vintage Santa Claus/Father Christmas postcards)
Happy Tuesday, everybody!
Dates: 6th May 2011 to 6th March 2012
23. It is home to the oldest tree in Europe, a twisted yew which has stood in Fortingall for 3,000 years. According to local legend, Pontius Pilate was born in its shade and played there as a child.
But there is hope: ‘You need to find an experienced literary consultant/marketing expert that can help you with this… If you would like us to arrange this for you, please let me know immediately.’
Thank you to everyone that joined us last week - we all really appreciate your support.
Until this past week. I have a liar in my fourth grade class. He lies about everything and I catch him every time. A known liar knows another liar when she sees one.
your heaven and your hell
We’ll have our upcycled/repurposed vintage wares for sale, including jewelry, collages, assemblage, dress forms, signs, junk, etc. We’re gonna pack a lot of very cool stuff into our little corner of the Outsider Art Fair show!! Terri has made some fabulous assemblage angels (sorry, but I didn’t have any pics to share…you’ll have to see for yourself how wonderful they are!!)
"The Green Eyed Monster"
If you are ever at the Houston Museum of Fine Arts or in the museum district, be sure to stop by here for a quick lunch!
This is the code word we came up with whenever tension arrises in front of our son and someone’s feelings are being hurt. That word, “cucumber” is supposed to cut off dead whatever is being said or about to be said. It’s like a safety word, similar to what S&M-y peeps use to make sure they don’t tape their breathing holes too tight or something. Anyway, we’re using it as a code word for war approaching. It’s a new thing that we’re trying out and the last few times it worked.
The only problem was those big holly leaves , caused by the big "berries" , needed a similarly large pudding to sit on ......so I didn't follow a pattern , just guestimated the size and made up the pattern as I went along. I'm really pleased with how it came out , especially the way the brandy sauce is running down the sides . The only problem being it turned out even bigger than I planned......
This motion was proposed the Brussels Fine Gael Branch and adopted at last weeks Ard Fheis in the Convention Centre in Dublin.
It’s a point echoed by Sharp who feels that, even in 2012, there remains a relative paucity of authentic roles for actresses to tackle.
Police or law enforcement agencies want to know why one become a serial killer or a thief or a murderer or does trafficking in women or children. Police definitely want to analyze and know why and when a serial killer strikes and kills. Psychologists criminologists with the help of mathematicians want to develop behavior models of human behavior that shapes a serial killer or a thief so that innocents can be saved. Dozens of specializations in psychology and mathematics developed to predict human behavior. In doing so they want to include all those bizarre past behavioral clues like when did he first smoke, with whom, did the parents in the house fight, did their parents have extra marital affairs, were their divorces in house, did his siblings beat him up, did his religious faith deep rooted, when did he first started taking drugs if at all with whom, where he lived how he lived, his friends their parents, pets, dress patterns, every minor thing to see if a mathematical model can be developed for observable behavior patterns (OBP). Along with them what ever DNA available at crime scenarios are also stored. Then these OBPs are ran across thousands of known unknown criminals or civilians in a given location to see they fit if in any one these OBPs are found. If DNA matches fail then law enforcement agencies observe who ever fits the pattern for years or at times decades both in public and private to see any future detectable behavior clues emerge. This waiting for serial killer to strike may take years and some times decades. That is the difficulty of predicting human behavior.
Whisk
Deadline: March 20, 2012.
“The best time to party on SPC campus is during the last days of school, but it is so difficult to balance booze, dudes, and school, so I just make my self completely unreachable,” said Sara Murolo senior student at SPC.
Into the 20th century, pioneering physicians including Dr. John Harvey Kellogg (of Kellogg's cereal fame), Dr. Norman Walker and Dr. Bernard Jensen stressed the importance of receiving regular colonics as part of a healthy lifestyle. In fact, until the 1930's, colon hydrotherapy was commonly practiced in many hospitals and doctors' offices, attesting to its legitimacy. Regrettably, the advent of pharmacology and the ensuing ubiquity of pharmaceuticals relegated colonics to virtual obsolescence for several decades.
Also currently on display the Smithsonian National Museum of American History is "Jefferson's Bible." Jefferson's compilation of different transcriptions of the Bible was meant as a personal exercise in order to better understand the life of Jesus, or as he titled it, "The Life and Morals of Jesus of Nazareth." You can view the book digitally as well as explore the conservation process on this website. The book will be on display until July 15, 2012.
or two and I am sure that I'll know when it is
At 8 miles last year was where the rot set in. (last year I went out really really fast and blew up at about 8 miles and managed to stagger home from there. It was fast overall, but it wasn't pretty and I was so traumatised afterwards that I didn't run for another month or so). This time ... I just kept on going. I was running into the gale force wind at this point, but my pace only slowed by the amount that I would expect because of the wind, not the tiredness.
“Riley, stop spacing out. Eat your food,” Nico scolded.
Our elephant has been parked squarely in the middle of too many American living rooms for too long. Yet we all know pink elephants are merely hallucinations, so there must be a way to make them disappear!
So that's what's going on here these days. Classes, GVHD and doctor's appointments, and snow. Nothing exciting, but that's probably good :)
“Yes, I can. “I have Islamic friends, I am not racist.
But perhaps with a few more years of articles like this Spiegel piece I quoted from above, we can begin having a more mature conversation about child labour and what to do about it.
Other than this cross-posting and promoting, however, there are no ties, editorial or otherwise. I get no financial benefit and there is no oversight or interference in any way over what I write. I also have a relationship with the Oregon Business Magazine where they, from time to time, excerpt and link to my posts. This relationship is similar in the complete lack of any financial or editorial ties.
Classic Epicureanism, despite the way the word is used today, was not hedonism as we commonly think of it. Epircuius taught that if chase “unstable” pleasures, we will be radically unhappy. The only true pleasures which cannot be taken away from us are “stable” pleasures, and these are those which anyone can have access to. These are the pleasures of money, power, fame, or anything which extends beyond the sheer pleasure of existing in the present moment. If we hope or fear for the future, or remain torn by regrest or guilt from the past, we will ruin the way the present is full of joy. See the world, experience it as a gift at each moment. No-one can take this away. All you need for happiness is right here. Right now.
Still feeling a little bleh. Christmas was fun so was New Years. Lots of shit piling up that's not making me feel any better.
He had a lovely time but was gob smacked when he visited Sun City, playing a round of Golf on the famous course. It was not the fact that there are real crocodiles in the water hazards that shocked him. It was a sign "No caddies past this point" - on the border of a crocodile infested pit.
4 months wasn't long enough for me to explain the words: "Terminal" and "Palliative Care", to my devastated mother...........
Yes, she is a single mother. wow.
I just think he’s getting better with age, what do you think? Compare age vs maturity shots—don’t you agree? (Then again, perhaps it’s just that I’m getting old myself!!!). But he does have such interesting character in his face I think. And speaking of character—that’s what draws me to him to be honest, the characters he’s played in recent years in particular.
I asked the waitress, what to do with the sauce and
I appreciate that there are exceptions to some of the above, that aspects of which I speak have already passed away at the insistence of “progressive” policies, and that the English and England are not without guilt over some aspects of their history, but today is St George’s day, so please allow me a level of jingoism unfettered.
To connect
O-KAME, daughter of the rich Gonyemon of Nagoshi, in the province of Tosa, was very fond of her husband, Hachiyemon. She was twenty-two, and Hachiyemon twenty-five. She was so fond of him that people imagined her to be jealous. But he never gave her the least cause for jealousy; and it is certain that no single unkind word was ever spoken between them.
turmeric powder 1/2tsp
I suppose, in full fairness, a trial that’s not a media circus would be somewhat possible. But if recent history is any indication — and there are three terrorist trials I have in mind (Timothy McVeigh, Ted Kaczynski, and Zacarias Moussaoui) — there will be a surfeit of media personalities trying to put their own spin on the proceedings. And only Tim McVeigh comes anywhere close to the notoriety that bin Laden would have had. Media circus or not, it would not have been a surprise to see the government seek the death penalty in the trial, and I’d be hard pressed to imagine a jury not recommending the death penalty, which would ultimately have been carried out.
For my thoughts are not your thoughts,
Palestine is Israeli occupied territory. Military orders govern all aspects of daily life. Democratic rights are denied. Freedom is a non-starter, persecution a way of life.
Dec. 10: Ryman Auditorium, Nashville, TN
is it awesome, is it terrible
Sadie JONES!!
In the evening, the stars were out gracing a dull night but it was not bright enough to cast any radiance to see what was ahead. Titanic at this point has taken up full speed. After the evening tradition of dinner and dancing, most of the Titanic passengers were already at the comfort of their beds. Some first class passengers were in the smoking room enjoying cigar and drinks and others were playing a game of poker and bridge as usual. No one wanted to be outside as it was insanely cold. The deck was deserted except for perhaps two or three third class passengers having a smoke.
In the past six months, I have found the two cell phones in locations about 100 feet apart on the side of the road as I was bicycling to work.
Next up: The Office
In addition to the €172m judgment which Moritz consented to, there is apparently further money owing to NAMA but there is to be a full hearing of the case in relation to these additional monies.
"Thank you for contacting us in support of the arts. Senator Obama is a champion for arts and culture. He knows that our nation's creativity has filled the world's libraries, museums, recital halls, movie houses, and marketplaces with works of genius. The arts embody the American spirit of self-definition. As the author of two best-selling books - Dreams from My Father and The Audacity of Hope - Barack Obama uniquely appreciates the role and value of creative expression.
Assuming that there is any steel in these sentiments, we can expect amendments to fly about - and unusual cross-party caucuses to form, agitating in one direction or the other. Those against the whole idea could be expected to oppose any extension of the language of marriage whatever, civil or religious. The potential knot of folk who might be snared by the notion of "compromising" on civil marriage can be expected to oppose empowering religious bodies to conduct same-sex marriages, while the last uncompromising group could be expected to support both propositions. By contrast, if the government introduces an uncompromising Bill to allow religious and civil same-sex marriages to take place, it at least seems likely that some enterprising tribune will conspire to bring forward a Cameron-inspired compromise, a vote on which will have to be taken.
Well, I didn't receive any negative comments for posting about myself on here - so here I go! My name is Missie. I'm 27, a wife, and a mother of 2 beautiful children. I live in Gig Harbor, Washington - one of the most beautiful places on the planet. I work full time at a newspaper doing administrative duties in the Advertising department. I grew up in Minneapolis, but have lived in several states throughout my life. I love to travel and see new places. I have 2 etsy shops, 3 facebook pages, 3 websites, and this blog. I am co-leader of the EtsyMom Team on etsy and an active member in the EtsyBloggers Team and Team etsyRAIN. I love to craft in all sorts of ways. I tend to get semi decent with one craft and then move on to another. I don't excel at any one thing in life - I'd rather enjoy it all. My current craft obsession is paper. I'm learning all sorts of new ways to include paper in my jewelry and how to make cards and bookmarks.
VERO BEACH, Fla. (AP) - A customer looking for a size 10 pair of sneakers at the Indian River Mall ended up with much more than he expected. The unidentified man found more than $5,200 in cash inside a black Reebok shoe he was trying on Tuesday, according to an Indian River County Sheriff's Office report.
He was no coward, but it wasn’t often he was faced with something like this.
Clinique Bottom Lash Mascara in Black
One of these days I’m going to buy some Kid Silk Haze and see what all the fuss is about. I swear.
There are a number of ways to showcase your talent and solicit business: from social media outlets, personal portfolio websites, to ‘broker’ sites. However, if you are going to be involved in the freelance field – especially if you are a writer or designer- there are two phrases that you should become familiar with: Intellectual Property and Works for Hire.
Popsicle…Jan & Dean
Milestones-
So why do people choose to create these slanted perspectives on their lives? My therapeutic perspective holds that people don’t continue behaviors if they are serving a purpose. So these stories serve some purpose of meet some need of the individual. Now, it may not be healthy or productive, but it is attempting to accomplish something in the person’s life.
I know you'll want to check out the full set on the GRS Blog & then make sure you hop around and see what the other DT girls came up with ~ I know you'll be blown away!
A baby who'll be treasured
Staring on September 6, daily blogs posts will be put up, celebrations of new books going into stores will be had, and for the launch month of the blog, many giveaways and contests will be held!
So here is Dark Horse Brewing's Reserve Special Black Ale. It is indeed black with a creamy dark tan head. Lots of roast and toffee in the nose. Kind of smells like a Heath Bar. Wrapped in bacon.
The more I learn about Bok Choy, the more amazed I am that I have never eaten this in my life until I grew it in my garden. The Chinese have been growing this amazing cabbage for 6000 years even though I find it somewhat bland and tasteless. So what’s amazing about a tasteless vegetable? A 6 ounce portion of boiled greens only has 20 calories and still supplies 144% of your daily need for vitamin A, 74% for Vitamin C, 16% of your calcium requirement and 10% of your iron needs.
Kristy off at her Co-Op placement and school.
They’ve got till 2012.
Steer clear of products or schemes that promise you overnight success. Many novice marketers succumb to this type of gimmick. Do some research, but remember that the bottom line is to actually make money. Some of the money that you are spending on books and seminars could be plowed back into your business.
You cunt!
But the fact that it was on the short side sort of prevented the sort of development of feelings that I tend to prefer, and haven’t found in many of the Gay Romances I’ve picked up lately. It all boils down to preference, of course, but when it comes to love, I’m all about the hearts and rainbows and feelings in addition to everything else. So I would have preferred more romance being involved in their encounters as well as their relationship. Brendan was a very tough Alpha male, and Stephen was more of a nice guy trying to figure things out, but in the case of Brendan less would have been more because he came across as an overbearing and cliche example of manly manliness in both his point of view sections as well as his dialogue.
I start to worry about things, because the peace in my tired mind had vacated hours ago. One anxious thought leads to another until the soundtrack to my mind goes something like this:
…and on top of all that, it has Laws’ usual sense for the dramatic and narratively-styled. Like Leverage and Smallville (and to a lesser extent, Buffy), it puts genre tropes front and centre (although I wish it hadn’t called itself space opera, it sounds cheesy and you can play this plenty dark and grounded). Planets are designed for the story around them, first and foremost. Adventures are built around premises and twists, because twists are what makes the half-hour ad-break interesting. But it keeps the core basis of simulational mechanics, which helps keep players grounded in the fictional world. It’s a nice balance, and the kind of thing that neither the old school hard-core sim games nor most bleeding edge indie games ever really got.
“In recent weeks, Dollo Ado in southern Ethiopia has been receiving a weekly average of 450 new Somali refugees. More than 8,500 have been registered so far this year, pushing the refugee population in the area’s five camps past the 150,000 mark,” said a UNHCR spokesman.
Keeping the flame low, add the Biscoff Spread and stir to dissolve. Poor into a gravy boat or sauce dish, and prepare to fall in love.
we read the nutcracker book during the week's leading up to
The Home Depot and California Relays meets need to be resurrected and put back on the schedule. New York and Eugene need to become FULL meets again that are worthy of attracting the world’s best without having to be bent and twisted to fit the Diamond League format. Because if we have any hope of regaining a place of prominence within the track and field community with respect to competitions here in the U.S. this is certainly not the way to do so. We’re not just losing ground to traditional track countries like Great Britain – which now has London, Gateshead AND Birmingham on the schedule – but to upstarts like Doha, Kingston, and Daegu. Granted Jamaica is a trackc happy place and has been working towards getting a major meet on the map for a while, but Doha and Daegu? When Wallace Spearmon ran 19.65 there in ’06 I had to Google it to see just where it was!
Thanks for visiting my little blog and I do like it very much if you leave me a comment, so thamks and till the next time.
Topped with a fragrant, foamy head, a glass mug of Mylanian ale has been dropped here, wafting scents of spiced pomegranate and tart cranberry.
You can regard me now;
(Also, we happen to truly believe that you are fantastic. Gratitude can be expressed in your choice of especially thoughtful Mother’s Day gifts or by successfully completing adolescence without the need to be bailed out of anywhere. Take your pick.)
DR MAROON: The moment you’ve waiting for is here!
Although media playback was a relative strong point of the Acer Iconia Tab A200, we did find that volume from the two small speakers situated on the back of the tablet was lacking. Similarly, we’ve seen brighter screens on rival Android devices, such as the Samsung Galaxy Tab 8.9.
In honor of the repellant Hugo Weaving playing the repellant Red Skull in the Captain America movie, here’s a couple of favorite scenes of mine from Super Villain Team-Up #16.
RPS: "Previous surveys and reports have been submitted to the Planning Service and the NIEA that established that the site does not have any evidence of 'Colette' bees and it is not necessary to resubmit these reports."
4. My children and I are still in the palm of God's hand. I've never doubted it.
- I did, once. Before we met. It was the only thing that could hold a whole chicken.
create a paper project using stamps - clear stamps, rubber stamps, image stamps, or sentiment stamps, any form of stamp
Sift the flour, baking powder and sugar together into a bowl - sprinkle over with the diced butter and then gently rub it in. Add in the rolled spelt and half the milk and start to stir - trickle in the rest of the milk a little at a time until it forms a soft dough. Cover and let it rest for an hour.
Finally picked out a lining for my bag. I found this Alexander Henry print in my stash - another good reason why I need to keep it neat! I'm hoping to finish this bag before I go away this weekend, but I don't know if I'm going to be able to....we'll see!
Are you fulfilling His good pleasure by doing that which He desires of you? I close by using Titus 2:12-13. The grace of God teaches us to live “soberly, righteously and Godly in this present world; looking for that blessed hope, and the glorious appearing of the great God and our Saviour Jesus Christ.” As we wait for heaven we are to comply with His will and walk in obedience to the Word of God.
smells of cobwebs n' dust
Next was a duck confit over pastry and a small salad paired Arcadia’s Cereal Killer Barleywine. This beer is now on tap at the Foundry, thanks to the new tap towers they installed. They now have an additional 12 or so beers on tap, so check the board next time you’re in there—you’re likely to stumble across a few brews you haven’t tried.
She spent the next six months in a children’s home before being adopted by a couple who lived 50 miles away. She had to adapt to her different family, start a new school, and make new friends.
Oil 2 teaspoons
